
https://www.independent.ie/entertainment/books/was-the-famine-genocide-by-the-british-28954929.html
	Was the Famine genocide by the British?

	The Famine was our Holocaust. During the mid-19th Century, Ireland experienced the worst social and economic disaster a nation could suffer. A quarter of the island's population starved to death or emigrated to escape truly appalling conditions.

	...The maxim of the Young Ireland leader John Mitchell was that "God sent the potato blight but the English created the Famine".

	...Feeding so many was already a problem before the Famine with bulk of the Irish population surviving on a subsistence diet.

	Coogan demonstrates that the British government was not oblivious to the plight of Ireland. The Whatley Commission on Irish poverty in 1833 had suggested that large-scale emigration to the colonies be encouraged and proposed that fisheries be developed and land be reclaimed among other measures.

	Had these recommendations been implemented, it would have done much to mitigate against the scale of the disaster which engulfed Ireland just over a decade later.

	Coogan's research gives credence to this view and he expertly catalogues a shocking combination of ambivalence, incompetence and malignance on the part of British policymakers.

	...Laissez-faire economics argued against the morality of assisting the poor because of the consequent risk of stultifying initiative and self-help among the Irish peasantry. One of laissez-faire's most influential proponents, Thomas Malthus, warned that extending relief would swallow the resources of the entire nation and consequently the poor had "no claim of right to the smallest portion of food".	

	Coogan's research shows how too often British policymakers put an adherence to a callous economic theory above their humanitarian responsibilities.

	It would be a mistake to dismiss Coogan's work as a green-tinted history. He is not ungenerous to Robert Peel, the British prime minister at the time of the outbreak of the Famine and for so long the bête noire of Irish nationalists.


25% Irish population dead, knew problem was coming but ignored, cited theories of Malthas


	...Coogan suggests that Peel did, in fact, attempt to alleviate the horrific situation in Ireland by facing up to the challenge of Corn Law reform and by making £100,000 available for the secret purchase of Indian corn in America.

	Coogan also points out that Peel's successor, John Russell, was outraged by the "lynch law of Irish landlords" in ruthlessly pursuing evictions at a time when this was akin to a sentence of death.

	Russell's efforts to offer legislative protection to Irish cottiers were, however, stymied by a powerful cabal in his own cabinet of Lord Palmerstown, the Marquis of Clanricarde and Lord Lansdowne, all of whom owned huge estates in Ireland.


prime ministers Peel and Russell made attemp to solve, said to have been blonked by cabal including Lord Palmserstown and Lord Landsowne


	...Coogan's work is a damning indictment of Charles Trevelyan, the assistant secretary to the Treasury, who was effectively in charge of Famine relief in Ireland.

	Trevelyan, today, is remembered more in sorrow than in anger in the classic song 'The Fields of Athenry', but he surely ranks alongside Cromwell as one of the greatest villains in Irish history.

	Trevelyan was motivated by racialism, laissez-faire dogmatism and anti-Catholicism. Coogan highlights in a variety of ways how Trevelyan's policies consigned a generation of Irish people to death or exile.


Trevelyan sent in charge of famine relief but ended up killing more


	But Trevelyan is most conclusively condemned in the dock of history by his own words.

	The man whose policies held sway over the fate of a starving population wrote : "The judgment of God sent the calamity to teach the Irish a lesson, that calamity must not be too much mitigated . . . the real evil with which we have to contend is not the physical evil of the Famine but the moral evil of the selfish, perverse and turbulent character of the people."


admitted to wanting famine

	...The Famine created an underbelly of resentment that helped poison Anglo-Irish relations until recent times.


------


https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/opinions/1997/09/17/irelands-famine-wasnt-genocide/ac7f1aa9-123c-47ac-a9b0-7c2cab697d37/
	IRELAND'S FAMINE WASN'T GENOCIDE
	By Timothy W. Guinnane September 17, 1997

	Students returning to high schools this fall will encounter another example of a recent and unwelcome development in public education. Several states have mandated that the Great Irish Famine of 1845-1850 be taught in their high schools as an example of genocide, sometimes in courses originally intended for the study of the Holocaust. More states are considering enacting similar measures. These mandates reflect the efforts of a small number of Irish American leaders who have pushed this line for ideological reasons. 


https://www.amazon.com/Vanishing-Irish-Timothy-W-Guinnane/dp/0691043078
	The Vanishing Irish
	by Timothy W. Guinnane 


hmmm



------


https://www.washingtonpost.com/opinions/the-famine-plot-englands-role-in-irelands-greatest-tragedy--by-tim-pat-coogan-and-the-graves-are-walking-the-great-famine-and-the-saga-of-the-irish-people-by-john-kelly/2013/01/12/22971008-3d7b-11e2-a2d9-822f58ac9fd5_story.html?noredirect=on&utm_term=.bae9f38a578b
	‘The Famine Plot: England’s Role in Ireland’s Greatest Tragedy ’ by Tim Pat Coogan and ‘The Graves are Walking: The Great Famine and the Saga of the Irish People’ by John Kelly 

	By Peter Behrens January 12, 2013

	Those days are gone. And these days, as Tim Pat Coogan writes in “The Famine Plot,” “poverty and emigration [have] remained continuing themes in Ireland,” and the country has been learning all over again that “its defenses were too fragile to cope with the longstanding Irish vices such as clientalism and corruption.” What Coogan suggests — and this is just one of many intriguing points made in his book — is a linkage between the recent Irish collapse, Irish feelings of helplessness and that demographic and moral disaster of the Irish 1840s: the potato famine, otherwise known as the Great Hunger. 

	What happened in 1840s Ireland, and why, and who was responsible, is also the subject of John Kelly’s cogent and forceful popular history, “The Graves Are Walking.” Kelly and Coogan have both written polemics against the British government of the day and its inadequate response to Ireland’s nightmare. They sustain their arguments with sound materials. Kelly, an American, is cool and prosecutorial in tone. He has the facts, ma’am, and his book is an accessible, engrossing history of horror. Coogan, the Irish author of controversial popular biographies of Michael Collins and Eamon de Valera, as well as a history of the Irish Republican Army, is fiercer and angrier. He sounds like the witness who saw the crime. 

	A fungus, phytophthora infestans, ravaged the Irish potato crop. But potato crops were infected elsewhere in northwest Europe during that decade. There was phytophthora infestans, but no famine, in Belgium, France and Scotland. Why did Ireland starve while Belgium did not? 

	Coogan’s pages spark and sputter with a deep, lingering, well-cherished rage at the British government and laissez-faire attitudes and policies adopted by Prime Minister Lord John Russell and civil servant Sir Charles Trevelyan . It was British reluctance to interfere with the supposed workings of the free-market economy that allowed famine to continue in Ireland at a time when the country was producing and exporting tons of food to England. 


gives some insight into how they think, basically "if you die from famine you deserve it", I guess some malthusian argument like it's natural selection


	Ireland’s history as a conquered nation shaped a disastrous system of land tenure, which resulted eventually in a large population dependent on a single crop. These were the conditions that turned crop failure into famine. But for many in London, it was the feckless Irish themselves — especially the proliferating, starving cottier class, crowded onto the most marginal lands in southwest Ireland — who were the core of the problem.

	The prevalent British view of the famine, Coogan writes, was that it resulted from “a flaw in the Irish character — the fecklessness and laziness that produced the potato economy also produced the other ills that afflicted the unhappy country.” Famine was horrible but seen from some corners of Whitehall as a necessary evil: a harsh but efficient solution to Irish overpopulation and disorganization, and the laziness supposedly inculcated by overdependence on the too-easy-to-cultivate potato. From London’s point of view, Ireland needed the taut discipline of a rigorously maintained free market — and a couple of million fewer Irish. Only then could the country’s disastrous system of landholding be straightened out, the “congested districts” relieved of population pressure and Irish society modernized along with Irish agriculture. 

	...Did the British government cause the famine? One way to consider the question is to pose another one. Did the George W. Bush administration cause Hurricane Katrina? No, nature did. But perhaps 300 years of American history had created a situation whereby a particular group of people, African Americans in the poorest quarters of New Orleans, were more vulnerable than most to that storm.


why is wapo printing this?


	And perhaps the administration, for political and historical reasons, was not inclined to be closely in touch with or responsive to the well-being of that population. Perhaps the inadequacy of the initial response to the natural disaster was compounded by streaks of racial prejudice and ideological blind spots, as well as by good old-fashioned incompetence.

	Natural forces cause hurricanes. And crop failures. In Ireland and in America, however, it is history that shapes a government’s intellectual, practical and political response, when Mother Nature flexes her sovereign power. 



------


from "The Famine Plot" pg 1


	...Ireland's tragedy at the time of the Famine was that, through conquest, she had no government of her own.

	...The experience of the largest Dublin cemetery, Glasnevin, is instructive. The cemetary was and is meticulous about records, but as the Famine progressed, the sheer weight of numbers forced the cemetery authorities to choose between accepting unidentified corpses for burial and leaving them to rot outside the cemetery gates. Bodies were normally accepted for burial only when properly certified and the identity vouched for by a relative or a respected personage such as a minister of religion. In one year of the Famine, however, 1849, recorded deaths, which had been 5,944 in 1845, rose to 10,047 and unidentified bodies amounted to another 10,000.

	...The silence of Irish historians about the official hate creation and the stimulation of anti-Irish prejudice that accompanied the Famine was, and to a large extent still is, remarkable. (Take Curtis, for example.) To put it mildly, Irish historians as a class have not done justice to the Famine. The colonial cringe seems to have informed the approach of many of them. From the mid-1960s onwards, as the Troubles in Northern Ireland worsened, revisionism became a matter not of revising opinions in the light of new research or new insights but of dealing with the political climate created by the war in Northern Ireland.


continuing Irish-England conflict helped cover-up complicity in famine


	...Another very important factor conditioned Irish historians' approach to assessing the Famine. Professor Joseph Lee has written as follows: "The external examiners in all Irish Universities came from England. Irish historians of that generation were bound to be conscious of the widespread English assumption that they might be prone to wild flights of Celtic fancy that any claims that sounded remotely exaggerated were in danger of being dismissed as extravagent. There may therefore have been a tendency to counter this image by insisting on the sobriety of one's scholarship."


huge problem of most people's understanding of the world today--don't understand how evil people can be and how many of them there are in positions of influence


authors writing makes it sound like he doesn't suspect any sort of wider misanthropic plot


pg 9

	"My lords, it is only by its government that such evils could have been produced: the mere fact that Ireland is in so deplorable and wretched a condition saves whole volumes of argument, and is of itself a complete and irrefutable proof of the misgovernment to which she has been subjected. Nor can we lay to our souls the 'flattering unction' that this misgovernment was only of ancient date, and has not been our doing . . . such a system of government could not fail to leave behind it a train of fearful evils from which we are suffering at the present day.

	We have a military occupation of Ireland, but that in no other sense could it be said to be governed: that it was occupied by troops, not governed like England."

	-Extract from a speech by Earl Grey, son of a former prime minister and, during the Famine, colonial secretary, speaking to the House of Lords during the early stages of the Famine on March 23, 1846


	...It was backyardism that gave rise to Ireland's three damnations: colonization, proximity, and religion.

	Raids by Irish pirates and disputes between representatives of the Irish church and the religious on the larger island who took their tone from Rome made minor outbreaks of hostility relatively commonplace between the two islands long before Columbus discovered America. But for our purposes it may be noted that the era of a more organized and sustained attempt at the colonization of Ireland could be said to have begun with the Normans. An Irish king, Diarmuid McMurragh, King of Leinster, invited the Normans to Ireland to help him in a dispute that arose when he kidnapped the wife of another chieftain.

	The pope of the day was an Englishman: Adrian, who was advised by another Englishman, John of Salisbury. Adrian granted Henry II a Papal Bull, Laudabiliter, legitimizing the Norman invasion. The papal deal with Henry II in effect ushered in a prolonged era of two forms of colonialism, those of Mother England and of Mother Church. The Irish were to be saved from the barbarity of their ways by a combination of Vatican directive and Norman steel.

	From the Vatican's point of view, the attraction of this arrangement lay in the fact that Rome would exert its authority through the appointment of hand-picked bishops, rather than having to struggle to assert its influence over powerful Irish abbots, who hitherto had often bee appointed by their families who controlled church lands and monastaries.


this guy probably isn't a propagandist


	The attraction for the Normans was straightforward--it gave them access to Irish land which, with their advances in agriculture, they were able to exploit far more profitably than were the cattle-herding Irish. And so Christ and Ceasar came to be hand in glove. Unfortunately, when Henry VIII defied the pope by divorcing his wife to marry Annne Boleyn, the gloves came off between king and pope, with disastrous results for the Irish.

	From the time of Henry VIII's breaking with Rome, England became a Protestant nation and Ireland remained a Catholic one. Thus, apart from the inveitable attempts by a larger country to subordinate a smaller neighbor, England's religious wars became superimposed on Ireland also. Not alone would the Catholic Irish lose their lands; they would also be forced to pay for the upkeep of the Portestant clergy.

	...The old English Catholics, who had settled peaceably enough in Ireland from Norman days onward to an extent that it was said they became more Irish than the Irish themselves, now became bracketed with the native Irish as objects of detestation not for merely Henry VIII, but for those who came after him, notably his daughter Elizabeth and Oliver Cromwell.

	Significantly for our story Lord Chichester, Queen Elizabeth's chief advisor, wrote: "I have often said, and written, it is Famine which must consume [the Irish]; our swords and other endeavors work not that speedy effect which is expected for their overthrow." Oliver Cromwell added a variant to the Chichester approach as he went through Ireland with a Bible in one hand and a sword in the other exulting in the doing of God's work by the combined slaughter of both the Irish and old English. Cromwell coined the slogan "to Hell or to Connacth" as he drove Catholics from the good lands to the barren boggy areas of the West.

	If ever one required and object lesson as to the validity of a saying I first heard in Vietnam--"When elephants fight it is the grass that gets tramped and the people are the grass"--one need look no further than Ireland.

	The victory of William of Orange over the Catholic King James II in 1690 at the Battle of the Boyne finally broke Catholic power in Ireland and is still fervently celebrated by the Protestants of northeastern Ireland, in the province of Ulster. This exemplifies the confusions and contradictions that can ensue when a small country gets caught up in power politics. The pope sought a Williamite victory, as part of his larger European designs (mainly against Louis XIV of France), and ordered that a Te Deum be rung from all churches. More importantly, Pope Innocent XI also secretly gave William large sums of money, a fact that would have shocked both Protestant and Catholic protagonists and that was withheld from the public until documents came to light in 2008. They showed that the pope had contributed some three and a half million in today's euro values toward the purchase of swords and muskets to what in effect became the enslavement of the Catholic Irish.


this guy is great


------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Williamite_War_in_Ireland
	The Williamite War in Ireland (1688–1691) (Irish: Cogadh an Dá Rí,[2][3][4] meaning "war of the two kings"), was a conflict between Jacobites (supporters of the Catholic King James II of England and Ireland, VII of Scotland) and Williamites (supporters of the Dutch Protestant Prince William of Orange) over who would be monarch of the Kingdom of England, the Kingdom of Scotland and the Kingdom of Ireland. It is also called the Jacobite War in Ireland or the Williamite–Jacobite War in Ireland.

	The cause of the war was the deposition of James as King of the Three Kingdoms in the "Glorious Revolution" of 1688. James was supported by the mostly Catholic "Jacobites" in Ireland and hoped to use the country as a base to regain his Three Kingdoms. He was given military support by France to this end. For this reason, the war became part of a wider European conflict known as the Nine Years' War (or War of the Grand Alliance). Some Protestants of the established Church in Ireland also fought on the side of King James.[5][6]

	James was opposed in Ireland by the mostly Protestant "Williamites", who were concentrated in the north of the country. William landed a multi-national force in Ireland, composed of English, Scottish, Dutch, Danish and other troops, to put down Jacobite resistance. James left Ireland after a reverse at the Battle of the Boyne in 1690 and the Irish Jacobites were finally defeated after the Battle of Aughrim in 1691.

	William defeated Jacobitism in Ireland and subsequent Jacobite risings were confined to Scotland and England. However, the War was to have a lasting effect on Ireland, confirming British and Protestant rule over the country for over two centuries. The iconic Williamite victories of the Siege of Derry and the Battle of the Boyne are still celebrated by (mostly Ulster Protestant) unionists in Ireland today.

	...Glorious Revolution

	The war in Ireland began as a direct consequence of the Glorious Revolution in England. James II of England and Ireland, VII of Scotland, who was a Roman Catholic, attempted to introduce freedom of religion for Catholics and bypass the English Parliament to introduce unpopular laws. For many in England, this was an unpleasant reminder of the rule of Charles I, whose conflict with the Parliament led to the outbreak of the English Civil War. The breaking point in James' relationship with the English political class came in June 1688 when his second wife gave birth to a son, which opened the prospect of an enduring Catholic Stuart dynasty. This fear led some political figures to conspire to invite William III, stadtholder of the main provinces of the Dutch Republic and husband of James’ daughter Mary Stuart, to invade England.[7]


https://www.telegraph.co.uk/news/1582225/Vatican-bans-book-revealing-secret-of-pope.html
	The authors said the problems arose because they found documents in both the Vatican Secret Archive and the Italian State Archives which suggest that William of Orange was receiving huge sums of money from Rome.

	In 1672, Louis had occupied the Netherlands. William led the resistance and, allied with Catholic Spain and Austria, drove out the French.

	William, who became King of Britain in 1689, has been revered in Ulster for centuries for his "Glorious Revolution", which drove James II, a Roman Catholic, from the throne.

	He gives his name to the loyalist Orange Order.

	Mr Sorti and Ms Monaldi said they found documents from a papal envoy discussing the "large sums" that William owed Pope Innocent XI.

	Corresponding documents from Innocent's family records show that the Holy See sent 150,000 scudi to William via an intermediary. The sum, equivalent to more than £3.5 million today, equalled the Vatican's annual budget deficit.


more like POPE GUILTY



------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Great_Famine_(Ireland)
	Since the Acts of Union in January 1801, Ireland had been part of the United Kingdom. Executive power lay in the hands of the Lord Lieutenant of Ireland and Chief Secretary for Ireland, who were appointed by the British government. Ireland sent 105 members of parliament to the House of Commons of the United Kingdom, and Irish representative peers elected 28 of their own number to sit for life in the House of Lords. Between 1832 and 1859, 70% of Irish representatives were landowners or the sons of landowners.[8] 


owners of Land in Ireland highly suspicious (according to rest of this article), had policies that contributed to famine significantly

much of irish rep in Parliament were landowners or related to them


	...In the 17th and 18th centuries, Irish Catholics had been prohibited by the penal laws from purchasing or leasing land, from voting, from holding political office, from living in or within 5 miles (8 km) of a corporate town, from obtaining education, from entering a profession, and from doing many other things necessary for a person to succeed and prosper in society. The laws had largely been reformed by 1793, and the Roman Catholic Relief Act 1829 allowed Irish Catholics to again sit in parliament. 


until 1793 and up to 1829, Irish Catholics had been barred from purchasing land, voting, getting education, "entering a profession", and "many other things necessary for a person to succeed and prosper in society." Largely reformed by 1793, allowed to sit in parliament by 1829.


	Landlords and tenants

	During the 18th century, the "middleman system" for managing landed property was introduced. Rent collection was left in the hands of the landlords' agents, or middlemen. This assured the landlord of a regular income, and relieved them of direct responsibility, while leaving tenants open to exploitation by the middlemen.[11]

	Catholics, the bulk of whom lived in conditions of poverty and insecurity despite Catholic emancipation in 1829, made up 80% of the population. At the top of the "social pyramid" was the "ascendancy class", the English and Anglo-Irish families who owned most of the land, and held more or less unchecked power over their tenants. Some of their estates were vast; for example, the Earl of Lucan owned over 60,000 acres (240 km2). Many of these landlords lived in England and were known as absentee landlords. The rent revenue—collected from "impoverished tenants" who were paid minimal wages to raise crops and livestock for export[12]—was mostly sent to England.[13]

	In 1843, the British Government considered that the land question in Ireland was the root cause of disaffection in the country. They established a Royal Commission, chaired by the Earl of Devon, to enquire into the laws regarding the occupation of land. Daniel O'Connell described this commission as "perfectly one-sided", being composed of landlords, with no tenant representation.[14] In February 1845, Devon reported:

	    It would be impossible adequately to describe the privations which they [the Irish labourer and his family] habitually and silently endure ... in many districts their only food is the potato, their only beverage water ... their cabins are seldom a protection against the weather ... a bed or a blanket is a rare luxury ... and nearly in all their pig and a manure heap constitute their only property.[15]

	The Commissioners concluded they could not "forbear expressing our strong sense of the patient endurance which the labouring classes have exhibited under sufferings greater, we believe, than the people of any other country in Europe have to sustain".[15] The Commission stated that bad relations between landlord and tenant were principally responsible.


after laws subjugating Irish, I guess switched to landlord-tenant system

kindof like fuedal system? would have to work the land to pay the rent, most of it sent to landowners back in England


	...The ability of middlemen was measured by the rent income they could contrive to extract from tenants.[11] They were described in evidence before the Commission as "land sharks", "bloodsuckers", and "the most oppressive species of tyrant that ever lent assistance to the destruction of a country".[11] The middlemen leased large tracts of land from the landlords on long leases with fixed rents, which they then sublet as they saw fit. They would split a holding into smaller and smaller parcels so as to increase the amount of rent they could obtain. Tenants could be evicted for reasons such as non-payment of rents (which were high), or a landlord's decision to raise sheep instead of grain crops. A cottier paid his rent by working for the landlord.[17] 


middlemen said to have been tyranical and important part of this system, tried to extract as much from tenants as possible


	...Landlords in Ireland often used their powers without compunction, and tenants lived in dread of them. Woodham-Smith writes that, in these circumstances, "industry and enterprise were extinguished and a peasantry created which was one of the most destitute in Europe".[15] 


landlords had basically life and death power over tenants and would wield it over them tyranically


	...In 1845, 24% of all Irish tenant farms were of 0.4–2 hectares (1–5 acres) in size, while 40% were of 2–6 hectares (5–15 acres). Holdings were so small that no crop other than potatoes would suffice to feed a family. Shortly before the famine the British government reported that poverty was so widespread that one-third of all Irish small holdings could not support their families after paying their rent, except by earnings of seasonal migrant labour in England and Scotland.[18] Following the famine, reforms were implemented making it illegal to further divide land holdings.[19]

	The 1841 census showed a population of just over eight million. Two-thirds of those depended on agriculture for their survival, but they rarely received a working wage. They had to work for their landlords in return for the patch of land they needed to grow enough food for their own families. This was the system which forced Ireland and its peasantry into monoculture, since only the potato could be grown in sufficient quantity. The rights to a plot of land in Ireland could mean the difference between life and death in the early 19th century.[12]  


holdings were so small that had to grow potatoes to feed family. Before famine about 1/3rd of Irish small holdings couldn't support families after paying rent


ended up with most of crop a single species of potato (how did that happen?)


	...The expansion of tillage led to an inevitable expansion of the potato acreage and an expansion of peasant farmers. By 1841, there were over half a million peasant farmers, with 1.75 million dependants. The principal beneficiary of this system was the English consumer.[22]

    	The Celtic grazing lands of ... Ireland had been used to pasture cows for centuries. The British colonised ... the Irish, transforming much of their countryside into an extended grazing land to raise cattle for a hungry consumer market at home ... The British taste for beef had a devastating impact on the impoverished and disenfranchised people of ... Ireland ... pushed off the best pasture land and forced to farm smaller plots of marginal land, the Irish turned to the potato, a crop that could be grown abundantly in less favorable soil. Eventually, cows took over much of Ireland, leaving the native population virtually dependent on the potato for survival.[24] 


using a lot of the land for cows instead of feeding people also said to contribute to famine (how did that happen?)


	...The Gardeners' Chronicle announced: "We stop the Press with very great regret to announce that the potato Murrain has unequivocally declared itself in Ireland."[38] Nevertheless, the British government remained optimistic over the next few weeks, as it received conflicting reports. Only when the crop was lifted in October did the scale of destruction become apparent.[41] Prime Minister Sir Robert Peel wrote to Sir James Graham in mid-October that he found the reports "very alarming", but reminded him that there was, according to Woodham-Smith, "always a tendency to exaggeration in Irish news".[42]


press reported on blight in Sep 1845. British gov remained optimistic until crop lifted in October and scale of destruction became apparent. in mid-October, Peel wrote reports "very alarming" but that there was "always a tendency to exaggeration in Irish news."


crop loss estimated to be between 1/3rd and 1/2 of cultivated acreage.


	...In early November 1845, a deputation from the citizens of Dublin, including the Duke of Leinster, Lord Cloncurry, Daniel O'Connell, and the Lord Mayor, went to the Lord Lieutenant of Ireland, Lord Heytesbury, to offer suggestions, such as opening the ports to foreign corn, stopping distillation from grain, prohibiting the export of foodstuffs, and providing employment through public works.[47] Lord Heytesbury urged them not to be alarmed, that they "were premature", that scientists were enquiring into all those matters,[fn 3] and that the Inspectors of Constabulary and Stipendiary Magistrates were charged with making constant reports from their districts; and there was no "immediate pressure on the market".[46] 


Early November, Deputation from Dublin went to Lord Lieutenant of Ireland Lord Heytesbury with ideas like open ports to foreign corn (why were they closed?), stop distillation from grain, prohibit exports, and provide employment through public works. Heytesbury said not to be alarmed and they were "premature" and that things were being investigated.

	
	On 8 December 1845, Daniel O'Connell, head of the Repeal Association, proposed several remedies to the pending disaster. One of the first things he suggested was the introduction of "Tenant-Right" as practised in Ulster, giving the landlord a fair rent for his land, but giving the tenant compensation for any money he might have laid out on the land in permanent improvements.[49] O'Connell then pointed out the means used by the Belgian legislature during the same season: shutting their ports against the export of provisions, but opening them to imports. He suggested that, if Ireland had a domestic Parliament, the ports would be thrown open and the abundant crops raised in Ireland would be kept for the people of Ireland. O'Connell maintained that only an Irish parliament would provide for the people both food and employment, saying that a repeal of the Act of Union was a necessity and Ireland's only hope.[49] 


Early December, Daniel O'Conell, head of Repeal Association, proposed tenant rights and food imports would help remedy impending disaster. He maintained that Irish having an Irish parliament was the way to do this.


	Mitchel raised the issue of the "Potato Disease" in Ireland as early as 1844 in The Nation, noting how powerful an agent hunger had been in certain revolutions.[50] On 14 February 1846, he put forward his views on "the wretched way in which the famine was being trifled with", and asked whether the Government still did not have any conception that there might be soon "millions of human beings in Ireland having nothing to eat".[51] 

	...Mitchel later wrote one of the first widely circulated tracts on the famine, The Last Conquest of Ireland (Perhaps), in 1861. It established the widespread view that the treatment of the famine by the British was a deliberate murder of the Irish, and it contained the famous phrase: "The Almighty, indeed, sent the potato blight, but the English created the Famine."[54] Mitchel was charged with sedition because of his writings, but this charge was dropped and he was convicted by a packed jury under the newly enacted Treason Felony Act and sentenced to 14 years transportation to Bermuda.[55]


the writer Mitchel said the government was ignoring famine and this might lead to revolution

Mitchel was notable for establishing view in Ireland that famine was deliberate murder of Irish by British 

Mitchel is interesting: https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/John_Mitchel


	...Historian F. S. L. Lyons characterised the initial response of the British government to the early, less severe phase of the famine as "prompt and relatively successful".[62] Confronted by widespread crop failure in November 1845, Prime Minister Sir Robert Peel purchased £100,000 worth of maize and cornmeal secretly from America[63] with Baring Brothers initially acting as his agents. The government hoped that they would not "stifle private enterprise" and that their actions would not act as a disincentive to local relief efforts. Due to poor weather conditions, the first shipment did not arrive in Ireland until the beginning of February 1846.[64] The initial shipments were of unground dried kernels, but the few Irish mills in operation were not equipped for milling maize and a long and complicated milling process had to be adopted before the meal could be distributed.[65] In addition, before the cornmeal could be consumed, it had to be "very much" cooked again, or eating it could result in severe bowel complaints.[64] Due to its yellow colour, and initial unpopularity, it became known as "Peel's brimstone".[66]


why did Peel have to "secretly" buy corn from America? How did it become unpopular?

	
	In October 1845, Peel moved to repeal the Corn Laws—tariffs on grain which kept the price of bread artificially high—but the issue split his party and he had insufficient support from his own colleagues to push the measure through. He resigned the premiership in December, but the opposition was unable to form a government and he was re-appointed.[67] In March, Peel set up a programme of public works in Ireland,[68] but the famine situation worsened during 1846, and the repeal of the Corn Laws in that year did little to help the starving Irish; the measure split the Conservative Party, leading to the fall of Peel's ministry.[69] On 25 June, the second reading of the government's Irish Coercion Bill was defeated by 73 votes in the House of Commons by a combination of Whigs, Radicals, Irish Repealers, and protectionist Conservatives. Peel was forced to resign as prime minister on 29 June, and the Whig leader, Lord John Russell, assumed the seals of office.[70] 


Peel tried to repeal tariffs on grain but split party. He resigned then was re-appointed (what was going on here?)

set up public works March 1845

forced to resign over "irish coercion bill" and replaced by Russel


	The measures undertaken by Peel's successor, Russell, proved comparatively inadequate as the crisis deepened. The new Whig administration, influenced by the doctrine of laissez-faire,[71] believed that the market would provide the food needed, and they refused to intervene against food exports to England, then halted the previous government's food and relief works, leaving many hundreds of thousands of people without any work, money, or food.[72] Russell's ministry introduced a new programme of public works that by the end of December 1846 employed some half million Irish and proved impossible to administer.[73] 


Russel said to have believed laissez-faire (along lines of Malthus?) would solve situation in ireland and his government refused to intervene on food exports

	
	Charles Trevelyan, who was in charge of the administration of government relief, limited the Government's food aid programme because of a firm belief in laissez-faire.[74] He thought that "the judgement of God sent the calamity to teach the Irish a lesson". 


Charles Trevelyan was in charge of gov relief but decided to limit food aid because of firm belief in "laissez-faire". Said famine was God teaching Irish a lesson.


------


https://www.nature.com/news/pathogen-genome-tracks-irish-potato-famine-back-to-its-roots-1.13021
	Weigel’s team also found nothing in the nuclear genomes of the famine strains to explain their ferocity. In fact, the strains lack a gene found in modern strains of P. infestans that overcomes the plant’s resistance genes. And, surprisingly, the famine strain seems less lethal than the P. infestans strains that now cause US$6 billion in crop damage per year. “It seems rather that the potatoes were unusually susceptible,” he says.


strain that caused famine less lethal than others, points to potatoes being "unusually susceptible"

	
	Meanwhile, a team led by Tom Gilbert and Mike Martin, evolutionary geneticists at the University of Copenhagen, looked more closely at such genes after sequencing the nuclear genomes of five herbarium strains of P. infestans. In unpublished work, the team identified numerous genes that differ between the historical samples and modern strains, including many disease genes that were missing from the famine strains. Their work also suggests that P. infestans may have been exported to Europe more than once during the famine.


strain may have been exported to Eruope (I thinks saying from U.S. to europe) more than once during the famine


	“What happened was that this pathogen had never seen cultivated potatoes before,” says Bill Fry, a plant pathologist at Cornell University in Ithaca, New York. It spread through potato fields like wildfire in Ireland and other countries where potatoes were grown intensively. “It destroyed the tops, it destroyed the tubers, and there was nothing for this very poor part of the population to eat.”


planting lots of potatoes close together contribute too?


...


https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pmc/articles/PMC3667578/
	Contrary to previous inferences (Ristaino et al., 2001; May and Ristaino, 2004), the 19th century strains are closely related to the modern US-1 lineage, but are characterized by a single, distinct mtDNA haplotype, HERB-1. Finally, from estimates of the divergence times of the different lineages, we were able to associate key events in P. infestans evolution with historic records of human migration and late blight spread.

	...Using the collection dates of the herbarium samples and isolation dates of the modern P. infestans strains, we estimated that type I and type II mtDNA haplotypes diverged close to the beginning of the 16th century (Figure 6 and Table 3). This coincides with the first contact between Americans and Europeans in Mexico, which potentially fuelled P. infestans population migration and expansion outside its center of diversity. This major event in human history might thus have been responsible for wider dissemination of the P. infestans pathogen in the New World, several centuries before its introduction to Europe. In addition, the divergence estimates allowed us to date the split between P. mirabilis and P. infestans about 1300 ya. Even though this was firmly during the period of pre-Columbian civilization, what led to their relatively recent speciation remains unknown.


blight DNA in famine can be distinguished from more common strain so I guess that means can track it

found that a strain spread across U.S. after first encounter between Europeans and Americans in Mexico

	
	...We therefore propose a revision of the previous scenario, which posited that a single P. infestans lineage migrated around 1842 or 1843 from Mexico to North America, from where it was soon transferred to Europe, followed by global dissemination and persistence for over hundred years (Goodwin et al., 1994). Our data make it likely that by the late 1970s, direct descendants of HERB-1 had either become rare or extinct. On the other hand, the close relationship between HERB-1 and US-1 suggests that the US-1 lineage originated from a similar source as HERB-1, with our divergence estimates indicating that the two lineages separated only in the early 19th century. Given the much greater genetic diversity at the species’ likely origin in Mexico, it seems unlikely that HERB-1 and US-1 spread independently from this region. An alternative scenario is that a small P. infestans metapopulation was established at the periphery of its center of origin, or even outside Mexico, possibly in North America, some time before the first global P. infestans pandemic. The first lineage to spread from there was HERB-1, which persisted globally for at least half a century. Subsequently, the US-1 lineage expanded and spread, replacing HERB-1 (Figure 11).


found there was more genetic diversity at origin, but small population established somewhere outside Mexico, and this is common ancestor of HERB-1 (blight in Irish famine) and US-1 (common one today)


	...Our analyses not only highlight how knowledge of the genetics and geographic distribution of modern strains is insufficient to correctly infer the source of historic epidemics (Goodwin et al., 1994), but they also reveal the shortcomings of inferences that are based on a very small number of genetic markers in historic strains (Ristaino et al., 2001; May and Ristaino, 2004). With our much richer dataset, we could demonstrate that the late blight outbreaks during the 19th century were a pandemic caused by a single P. infestans lineage, but that this lineage was not the direct ancestor of the one that had come to dominate the global P. infestans population during much of the 20th century. Infected plant specimens stored in herbaria around the world are thus a largely untapped source to learn about events that affected millions of people during our recent history.


think I get it--since US-1 not a descendant of HERB-1, can track where HERB-1 spread to. It's more like a small offshoot that was spread around and not the main strain of the organism.



http://www.pnas.org/content/111/24/8791.full
	The potato late blight pathogen was introduced to Europe in the 1840s and caused the devastating loss of a staple crop, resulting in the Irish potato famine and subsequent diaspora. Research on this disease has engendered much debate, which in recent years has focused on whether the geographic origin of the pathogen is South America or central Mexico. Different lines of evidence support each hypothesis. We sequenced four nuclear genes in representative samples from Mexico and the South American Andes. An Andean origin of P. infestans does not receive support from detailed analyses of Andean and Mexican populations. 


a debate on origin of blight pathogen (why?)


anyway, sounds like Europeans who first met Americans in Mexico spread it somewhere else in North America, then it was spread to Ireland


https://www.livescience.com/57363-irish-potato-blight-originated-in-south-america.html
	Irish Potato Blight Originated in South America

	...The researchers found that both New World and Old World blight outbreaks were caused by pathogens with an SSR lineage that they dubbed FAM-1. (Previous research by another group had suggested the culprit was a different genetic variant called HERB-1, but that variant was not exclusive to the P. infestans pathogen, Ristaino wrote.)

	After analyzing the patterns of mutations in these samples, the researchers used computer models to determine the probability of scenarios that could have led to those patterns. They determined that the most likely scenario was that the pathogen strain originated from a South American ancestor and then split into U.S. and Mexican strains.


https://www.nytimes.com/2001/06/07/world/testing-links-potato-famine-to-an-origin-in-the-andes.html

https://news.ncsu.edu/2015/11/famine-pathogen-south-america/

https://www.sciencealert.com/ireland-s-great-potato-famine-started-in-south-america-researchers-find

http://journals.plos.org/plosone/article?id=10.1371/journal.pone.0168381

debate still going?


...

more on history of potato and the blight pathogen:

https://www.history.com/news/after-168-years-potato-famine-mystery-solved
	First domesticated in southern Peru and Bolivia more than 7,000 years ago, the potato began its long trek out of South America in the late 16th century following the Spanish conquest of the Inca. Though some Europeans were skeptical of the newly arrived tuber, they were quickly won over by the plant’s benefits. Potatoes were slow to spoil, had three times the caloric value of grain and were cheap and easy to grow on both large farms and small, backyard lots. When a series of non-potato crop failures struck northern Europe in the late 18th century, millions of farmers switched to the more durable spud as their staple crop.

	Nowhere was dependency on the potato more widespread than in Ireland, where it eventually became the sole subsistence food for one-third of the country. Impoverished tenant farmers, struggling to grow enough food to feed their families on plots of land as small as one acre, turned to the potato en masse, thanks to its ability to grow in even the worst soil. Requiring calorie-heavy diets to carry out their punishing workloads, they were soon consuming between 40 and 60 potatoes every day. And the potato wasn’t just used for human consumption: Ireland’s primary export to its British overlords was cattle, and more than a third of all potatoes harvested were used to feed livestock.

	By the early 19th century, however, the potato had begun to show a tendency toward crop failure, with Ireland and much of northern Europe experience smaller blights in the decades leading up to the Great Famine. While the effects of these failures were largely ameliorated in many countries thanks to their cultivation of a wide variety of different potatoes, Ireland was left vulnerable to these blights due to its dependence on just one type, the Irish Lumper. When HERB-1, which had already wreaked havoc on crops in Mexico and the United States, made its way across the Atlantic sometime in 1844, its effect was immediate—and devastating. Within a year, potato crops across France, Belgium and Holland had been affected and by late 1845 between one-third and one-half of Ireland’s fields had been wiped out. The destruction continued the following year, when three-quarters of that year’s harvest was destroyed and the first starvation deaths were reported.

	As the crisis grew, British relief efforts only made things worse: The emergency importation of grain failed to prevent further deaths due to Ireland’s lack of working mills to process the food; absentee British landlords evicted thousands of starving peasants when they were unable to pay rent; and a series of workhouses and charity homes established to care for the most vulnerable were poorly managed, becoming squalid centers of disease and death. By 1851 1 million Irish—nearly one-eight of the population—were dead from starvation or disease. Emigration from the country, which had steadily increased in the years leading up to the famine, ballooned, and by 1855 2 million people had fled, swelling the immigrant Irish populations of Canada, the United States, Australia and elsewhere. Even today, more than 150 years later, Ireland’s population has still not recovered its pre-famine level. Those that stayed behind, haunted by their country’s suffering, would form the basis of an Irish independence movement that continued into the 20th century.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_the_potato
	Sailors returning from the Andes to Spain with silver presumably brought maize and potatoes for their own food on the trip.[9] Historians speculate that leftover tubers (and maize) were carried ashore and planted: "We think that the potato arrived some years before the end of the 16th century, by two different ports of entry: the first, logically, in Spain around 1570, and the second via the British Isles between 1588 and 1593 ... we find traces of the transport of potatoes travelling from the Canaries to Antwerp in 1567 ... we can say that the potato was introduced there [the Canary islands] from South America around 1562 ... the first written mention of the potato [is] ... a receipt for delivery dated 28 November 1567 between Las Palmas in the Grand Canaries and Antwerp."[10]

	...The English privateer Sir Francis Drake, returning from his circumnavigation, or Sir Walter Raleigh's employee Thomas Harriot[12] are commonly credited with introducing potatoes into England. 

	...The potato first spread in Europe for non-food purposes. It was first eaten on the continent at a Seville hospital in 1573. After Philip II received potatoes from Peru, he sent harvested tubers to the pope, who sent them to the papal ambassador to the Netherlands because he was ill. Clusius indirectly received his tubers from the ambassador; he planted them in Vienna, Frankfurt, and Leyden, and is the person who widely introduced the plant to Europe.

	...In France and Germany government officials and noble landowners promoted the rapid conversion of fallow land into potato fields after 1750. The potato thus became an important staple crop in northern Europe. Famines in the early 1770s contributed to its acceptance, as did government policies in several European countries and climate change during the Little Ice Age, when traditional crops in this region did not produce as reliably as before.[11][15][16] 

	...In France, at the end of the 16th century, the potato had been introduced to the Franche-Comté, the Vosges of Lorraine and Alsace. By the end of the 18th century it was written in the 1785 edition of Bon Jardinier: "There is no vegetable about which so much has been written and so much enthusiasm has been shown ... The poor should be quite content with this foodstuff."[18] It had widely replaced the turnip and rutabaga by the 19th century.[19]


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Antoine-Augustin_Parmentier
	Antoine-Augustin Parmentier (French pronunciation: ​[ɑ̃twanə.oɡystɛ̃ paʁmɑ̃tje]; Montdidier 12 August 1737 – 13 December 1813) is remembered as a vocal promoter of the potato as a food source for humans in France and throughout Europe. His many other contributions to nutrition and health included establishing the first mandatory smallpox vaccination campaign (under Napoleon beginning in 1805, when he was Inspector-General of the Health Service)

	...Potato publicity stunts

	Parmentier therefore began a series of publicity stunts for which he remains notable today, hosting dinners at which potato dishes featured prominently and guests included luminaries such as Benjamin Franklin and Antoine Lavoisier, giving bouquets of potato blossoms to the King and Queen, and surrounding his potato patch at Sablons with armed guards to suggest valuable goods — then instructing them to accept any and all bribes from civilians and withdrawing them at night so the greedy crowd could "steal" the potatoes.

	...Acceptance of the potato

	In 1771 Parmentier won an essay contest in which all the judges voted the potato as the best substitute for regular flour.[5] This was before a time France needed a replacement for wheat, so Parmentier continued to face criticism and lack of acknowledgment for his work. The first step in the acceptance of the potato in French society was a year of bad harvests, 1785, when the scorned potatoes staved off famine in the north of France. In 1789 Parmentier published Treatise on the Culture and Use of the Potato, ..."printed by order of the king", giving royal backing to potato eating, albeit on the eve of the French Revolution, leaving it up to the Republicans to accept it.[7] In 1794 Madame Mérigot published La Cuisinière Républicaine (The [Female] Republican Cook), the first potato cookbook, promoting potatoes as food for the common people.[7][8][9]


https://books.google.com/books?id=ekmLpQC9JWkC&pg=PA90&lpg=PA90
	In the 18th century France potatoes were avoided like the plague, despite efforts by Marie-Antoinette to make the potato more fashionable by wearing potato blossoms in her hair.

	However, the French pharmacist Antoine Augustin Parmentier believed the potato could be the answer for French farmers ...Paramentier often mentioned the name of Michel-Guillaume de Creveceur in his writings. The latter ...had written a best-selling book called Letters from an American Farmer and under the pseudonym of "Normannus Americanus" he wrote a pamphlet on growing potatoes in the American colonies.

	Benjamin Franklin suggested that Parmentier should hold a banquet at Les Invalides with potatoes in every course ...The idolised Dr Franjklin, always wearing his marten fur cap, attended as the guest of honour. He feasted on every course and gave it a rave review.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_the_potato
	...The annual potato crop of France soared to 21 million hectoliters in 1815 and 117 million in 1840, allowing a concomitant growth in population while avoiding the Malthusian trap. Although potatoes had become widely familiar in Russia by 1800, they were confined to garden plots until the grain failure in 1838–39 persuaded peasants and landlords in central and northern Russia to devote their fallow fields to raising potatoes. Potatoes yielded from two to four times more calories per acre than grain did, and eventually came to dominate the food supply in Eastern Europe. 

	...In the German lands, Frederick the Great, king of Prussia, strove successfully to overcome farmers' skepticism about the potato, and in 1756 he issued an official proclamation mandating its cultivation. 

	...The crop slowly spread across Europe, such that, for example, by 1845 it occupied one-third of Irish arable land.[citation needed] Potatoes comprised about 10% of the caloric intake of Europeans.[citation needed] Along with several other foods that either originated in the Americas or were successfully grown or harvested there, potatoes sustained European populations.[21]

	...Potatoes became popular in the north of England, where coal was readily available, so a potato-driven population boom provided ample workers for the new factories. Marxist Friedrich Engels even declared that the potato was the equal of iron for its "historically revolutionary role".[13]

	...A lack of genetic diversity from the low number of varieties left the crop vulnerable to disease. In the early 1800s, a strain of potato blight (Phytophthora infestans) known as HERB-1 began to spread in the Americas, especially Central and North America destroying many crops. The blight spread to Europe in the 1840s where, because of an extreme lack of genetic diversity, the potato crops were even more susceptible. In Northern Europe there were major crop losses lasting throughout the rest of the 19th century. Ireland in particular, because of the extreme dependence of the poor, especially western Ireland, on this single staple crop, was devastated by the blight's arrival in 1845.[24][25]


blight maybe more "man" than "God" than one might think



https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/European_Potato_Failure
	The effect of the crisis on Ireland is incomparable to all other places, causing one million deaths,[citation needed] up to two million refugees, and spurring a century-long population decline. Excluding Ireland, the death toll from the crisis is estimated to be in the region of 100,000 people. Of this, Belgium and Prussia account for most of the deaths, with 40,000–50,000 estimated to have died in Belgium, with Flanders particularly affected, and about 42,000 estimated to have perished in Prussia. The remainder of deaths occurred mainly in France, where 10,000 people are estimated to have died as a result of famine-like conditions.[2]


here's an article on I guess where it started in New England, dated Oct 2 1844:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/404606731/?terms=potato%2Bblight
	THE DISEASE IN POTATOES

	There is no topic of conversation more common or more interesting, at this time, among farmers, than the disease which seems to have affected the potato crop in New York, Vermont, New Hampshire, COnnecticut, and Massachusetts.

	...A writer in a late number of the Utica Gazette, thinks that the disease is the effect of an insect. This is not the general opinion. THe disease has been on the increase for several years, and has excited great interest in Scotland, Germany and Russia.

	...The loss last season from rot in potatoes, in this State [Massachusetts], exceed several hundred thousand dollars, and we fear that this year it will fall but little below one million.

	...Vermont:

	"Our crops are all good, excepting potatoes. There is not only a blast upon them, but a disease which renders them unfit for use: in many fields, nine-tenths are rotten, or are beginning to rot. Many hogs are said to have died in consequence of eating them. Such a thing never was known before here. ...The Millerites say it is a judgment sent from God, for not believing their peculiar doctrine; but it seems *their* potatoes don't escape, but share the same fate of the unbelievers."

	Rot in Potatoes.--We continue to have accounts from various quarters of what is supposed to be a disease among potatoes. This is certainly uncommon in New England, though in New York the same complaint was made last season.

	The summer has been uncommonly dry near Boston, yet the potato crop is quite as good as common: and we hear of but few instances of rot in potatoes here. In Worcester county, and through-out New Hampshire, the summer has been more wet, and there we find more cases of the rot.

	We cannot account for this uncommon attack on this useful plant: we must have more facts, to give us a clue to the cause. If the season had been uncommonly wet, we should suspect that might have some influence. We are inclined to think we do not revert often enough to first principles: our potatoes deteriorate by planting the tubers for a long course of years, as all know who have paid attention to it. 

	...Nearly or quite the entire crop of potatoes in this region is lost! When dug they are found to be diseased and rotten.


a lot of crops lost according to reports, one report gives bad advice saying "it was probably just too wet" and dismisses idea of disease, another said it was a matter of concern in Germany, Scotland, and Russia


in Sep 1844 were discussing "rot of the potato" in England: https://www.newspapers.com/image/400890842/?terms=potato%2Bblight


kindof interesting 12 march 1842  in English paper:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/392902996/?terms=potato
	THE POTATO.

	The potato is hardly second to whet in its importance to man; and although it has been reviled as the mother of pauperism, or stigmatised as the great cause of Irish misery, it will always continue to contribute to the nations of the earth a most essential part of their daily bread.


apparently got reputation "reviled" in association with pauperism, stigmitised in association with Irish


goes on to say there is bad managment being done in cultivating potatoes, reccomendations on how close to plant potatoes


May 19 1843 article in English paper saying some potatoes have become deformed, wondering if "from the soil or the seed:" https://www.newspapers.com/image/395486608/?terms=potato

a guy named "Sir Charles Lemon" was investigating it, also mentioned here: https://www.newspapers.com/image/409682632/?terms=potato%2Bdisease

here's what he wrote in "Royal Agricultural society:" https://books.google.com/books?id=Z5oEAAAAYAAJ&pg=PA431&lpg=PA431&dq=Sir+%22Charles+Lemon%22+potatoes&source=bl&ots=R0wGco2ttB&sig=RV3PQP3Iea6Kx8VGtIqjTHgBHBU&hl=en&sa=X&ved=0ahUKEwiIudn94tvaAhUPNd8KHf7mCosQ6AEITTAJ#v=onepage&q=Sir%20%22Charles%20Lemon%22%20potatoes&f=false

I guess their potatoes had genetic defects, but they wouldn't have been able to figure that out at that point in history


April 20, 1844, a guy did some research in England and concluded a potato disease people were worried about "must be attributed to the potato itself:" https://www.newspapers.com/image/395997701/?terms=potato%2Bdisease


Jul 13 1842 article in Dublin, "Freeman's Journal":

https://www.newspapers.com/image/385245932/?terms=potato%2Bdisease
	THE DISTRESS-THE GOVERNMENT-THE LANDLORDS.

	Although public attention has at length been awakened to the prevalent destitution, we regret that there are no reasonable hopes of its speedy removal. The weather for the last fornight has been such as greatly to retard, if providentially it has not permanently injured, the growing crops, more especially the potato crops, on which the poor so exclusively depend for food. 

	...If the poor are driven to an over-early use of the growing potato crop, two things will assuredly result. This year they will be the victims of fever and disease; the next will again find them a prey to deplorable distress, as greivous as that under which they now suffer. We regret to learn that already in the district of Kilgeever, of which our readers have heard o much, the people are running for subsitence to the potato fields.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Freeman%27s_Journal
	The Freeman's Journal was the oldest nationalist newspaper in Ireland. It was founded in 1763 by Charles Lucas and was identified with radical 18th-century Protestant patriot politicians Henry Grattan and Henry Flood. This changed from 1784 when it passed to Francis Higgins (better known as the "Sham Squire")[1][2] and took a more pro-British and pro-administration view. In fact Francis Higgins is mentioned in the Secret Service Money Book as having betrayed Lord Edward FitzGerald. Higgins was paid £1,000 for information on FitzGerald's capture.[3]

	In the 19th century it became more nationalist in tone, particularly under the control and inspiration of Sir John Gray (1815–75).

	The Journal, as it was widely known as, was the leading newspaper in Ireland throughout the 19th century. Contemporary sources record it being read to the largely illiterate population by priests and local teachers gathering in homes. It was mentioned in contemporary literature and was seen as symbolising Irish newspapers for most of its time. By the 1880s it had become the primary media supporter of Charles Stewart Parnell and the Irish Parliamentary Party (IPP).


kinda weird

seems like they shoulda known this was coming


this is interesting: Glasgow Herald, Aug 12 1844:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/409188973/?terms=potato%2Bdisease
	DISCUSSION ON THE FAILURE IN THE POTATO CROP.

	...the subject chosen for discussion was the nature and causes of the disease in potatoes. Go where they would, where failure existed, they would find that every farmer had a reason of his own for it. But it was not opinions, but facts and explanations that were wanted... He had made much inquiry into this subject, and found that the disease in potatoes was not confied to this country nor indeed to Europe. It existed in Germany, in North and South Russia, in Enmakr, in the United States, in North and South America--in short, the epidemic appears to have made the range of the world. When facts like these were known, they would see that the idea of curing the disease by importing potatoes from America was a very fallacious one; and it showed them that to cure it they must adopt some other fundamental principie. He had received volumes, which had been written on the subject, from Germany, Russia, and the United States, as well as various communications from intelligent agriculturists. ...The Learned Professor then read a letter from Mr. Girdwood, factor to the Marquis of Bute, of which the following are extracts:--

	"Allow me in this way to state to you what has occured in my experience, both in this year and last, in reference to the disease in potato, which, without suggesting any remedy, only shows more strongly its mysterious capriciousness. ...they succeeded well in 1841 and 1842, and I had every reason to expect they were going to turn out valuable field varieties. Last year, however, (1843) they were almost a total failure; still the few that did grow were preserved, have been planted this year, and have become healthy and vigorous. Again, on the same field last year, (1843) a plot of smooth beds showed symptoms of disease, in fact there was a good many blanks, and the whole plot was stunted and weakly."


	...In reference to the taint in potatoes, he might state that there was no failure 30 years ago, although it was often roughly treated; now disease existed in almost every country where the potat was cultivated whether in Europe or America. The oldest varities, viz., the rought red and common red are most subject to disease; the cups, one of the newest sorts, blossoms, but seldom bears apples in Scotland; it is one of the most healthy kinds, but within the last two years has begn to fail in Ireland. 

	...Under these circumstances he saw no alternative but to get a fresh supply of seed--and the sooner the better--from Peru, or any other native country of the potato, where fresh plants have been allowed to come up every successive year. Unless something were done the potato might degenerate altogether.

	...while men of science, like Professor Johnston, could digest that information, and reconcile what appeared inconsistent; and he had no doubt, notwithstanding the forebodings of Mr. Stirling, that the cultivation of so invaluable an article of food as the potato, would be greatly improved and extended. (Cheers.)

	The meeting then separated.


a lot written on "epidemic" on potatoes by 1844, some observers say started in scotland in 1843, a lot written in Germany, Russia, and U.S. Question up in air whether potato cultivation could continue. Someone had idea (who?) of importing potatoes from the U.S. to fix it, but it was pointed out that wouldn't make sense since epidemic there.


Aberdeen Journal Scotland Nov 27, 1844:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/393153035/?terms=potato%2Bdisease
	ON DISEASE OF THE POTATO.

	So much has been said and written of the disease incident to the potato, that it is difficult to make any new observation or experiment. A gentleman, who has carefully considered the subject, states as follows:--

	"The innocent potato itself is more sinned against than sinning. It is drawn and mangled, cut and disfigured, and weitering in its wounds is thrown into the earth, to live or die, without regard either to the state of the weather, or the state of the seed--things carefully considered in the sowing of every other crop. I hold that whatever is opposed to nature is wrong in practice. I do not mean to uphold the doctrine, that splits, or cut potatoes, will not grow; but I mean to say, they will occasionally, and often do, fail, while the whole or unmutilated potato never does.


were they growing potatoes by cutting them up instead of seeds?

would think asexual reproduction of potatoes would make them more susceptible to disease

Glasgow Herald Jul 8 1844:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/409188227/?terms=potato%2Bdisease
	Potato Blosson.--We observe that a letter has been addressed to the editor of the Hereford Times, by Mr. W. Godsall, strongly recommending all persons interested in the potato crop, especially cottagers, to pull off the flowers diligently as soon as they appear. We beg to second that reccomendation. All experience shows that flows of the potato are produced at the expense of that organisable matter which gives its value to the tuber, and which is diminished in quantity in proportion to the number of flowers that have been fed. For flowers must exist and feed on something, and that something is what would, if not removed by the flowers, descend beneath the ground and collect intself in the tubers. ...The man who makes his potato ground feed flowers prevents its feeding his children. Every ounce of matter consumed by the flowers is so much taken for the consumption of the family. We cannot just now lay our hands on any precise evidence of how much is lost in this way. Mr. Godsall assumes it to amount to many hundred weights, or even a ton an acre; but he is in all probability under the mark.



...


https://www.historylearningsite.co.uk/ireland-1845-to-1922/the-great-famine-of-1845/
	In 1844, a new form of potato blight was identified in America. It basically turned a potato into a mushy mess that was completely inedible. The American blight was first identified in France and the Isle of Wight in 1845. The summer of 1845 was mild but very wet in Britain. It was almost the perfect weather conditions for the blight to spread. The blight is still with us and is called ‘Phytophthora Infestans’ – an air carried fungus.

	The people of Ireland expected a good potato crop in 1845. The weather had appeared to be favourable and in many senses, the farming community of Ireland expected a bumper harvest. However, when it came to digging up the potatoes, all they got was a black gooey mess. In fact, the expected bumper crop turned out to be a disaster. There was a 50% loss of potatoes in this year. The rural community had no way of countering this. Each family grew what they needed for that year and few had any to keep for times of trouble. In fact, the problem got worse. The crop of 1846 was all but a total failure and there was a very poor harvest in 1847. Three disastrous years in succession presented Ireland with huge problems.

	The advice given to those affected by the potato blight bordered on the absurd. One scientist advised people to get hold of chloric acid and manganese dioxide. This mixture should have been been added to salt and applied to the diseased area of the potato. Even if the farmers had the opportunity to obtain such chemicals, they would have produced chlorine gas used to poison troops in World War One!


more bad advice given to famine victims


	...There were some good landlords. Vaughan in County Mayo is recognised as one, but he was simply overwhelmed by the extent of the poverty. Tenants on neighbouring estates came to his land for help but Vaughn was swamped by the sheer numbers involved. Ironically, those landlords who can be classed as compassionate suffered as a result of those who did nothing.

	Some landlords resorted to forced emigration of their tenants in an effort to ‘solve’ the problem in Ireland. In October 1847, the ship ‘Lord Ashburton’ carried 477 Irish emigrants to North America. 177 of these people came from one estate owned by an absentee landlord. They were so poor that they were all but naked for the journey and 87 had to be clothed by charity groups in America before they could leave the ship. On this particular voyage, 107 people died of dysentery and fever. The ‘Quebec Gazette’ described the ‘Lord Ashburton’ and all that it represented as “a disgrace to the Home Authorities.” The absentee landlord who had forced 177 of his tenants onto the ship was Lord Palmerston, the British Foreign Secretary at this time, and one of the most famous of Britain’s politicians in the Nineteenth Century.


Palmerston sketchy guy landowner in ireland and involved in emigration of Irish to U.S. where conditions compared to slave trade: https://www.jstor.org/stable/3133615?seq=1#page_scan_tab_contents


	...Ironically, the famine did not help those who stayed on the land. With far fewer people to work the land, it might be thought that landlords would be less harsh on their tenants as they had a vested interest in having their land worked. This did not happen. Landlords used the opportunity to ‘rationalise’ their estates and there were more evictions even after the famine had ended.


so far sounds like they knew famine was coming, knew potato sustained poor in Europe and had reputation of that, instead of trying to fix problem gave them advice that would kill them, did nothing, depopulated Ireland and sent millions to U.S. where they were treated with racism too



conquered Irish with help from Pope, planned on starving, kept subjugated with laws and impoverished, set up landlord fuedal systema and forced to grow potatoes on small land, ended up reliant on one species of potato by time of famine

potato blight widely reported in U.S. 1843-44

an alarm had been raised about disease in potato crops around Europe and Russia by 1844, loss of potato cultivation contemplated

someone had the idea of fixing blight by importing from America and strain was found to be imported more than once from America in later genetic research

by the time reports of major loses of 1/3rd to 1/2 in Ireland, British gov reccomended not to do anything "prematurely", ignored proposals for importing food



...


I guess Aruthur Chichester came up with the idea:

https://en.wikisource.org/wiki/Chichester,_Arthur_(1563-1625)_(DNB00)
	Of any sympathy with the Irish character there is no trace in Chichester's letters. Like every Englishman of that day, he had no other recipe for Irish misery than the enforced adoption of English habits. 'We follow,' he wrote on 5 Oct., 'a painful, toilsome, hazardous, and unprofitable war, by which the queen will never reap what is expected until the nation be wholly destroyed or so subjected as to take & new impression of laws and religion, beins; now the most treacherous infidels ot the world, and we have too mild spirits and good consciences to be their masters. He is a well-governed and wary gentleman whom their villany doth not deceive. Our honesty, bounty, clemency, and justice make them not any way assured to us ; neither doth the actions of one of their own nation, though it be the murder of father, brother, or friend, make them longer enemies than until some small gift or buyinff [?] be given unto the wronged party.' With these sentiments Chichester had nothing but commendation to bestow on Mountjoy's mode of carrying on the war. 'I wish,' he wrote on 14 March 1602, 'the rebels and their countries in all parts of Ireland like these, where they starve miserably, and eat dogs, mares, and garrons where they can get them. No course . . . will cut the throat of the grand traitors, subject his limbs, and bring the country into quiet, but famine, which is well begun, and will daily increase. When they are aown, it must be good laws, severe punishment, abolishing their ceremonies and customs in religion, and lordlike Irish government, keeping them without arms more than what shall be necessary for the defence of the honest, and some port towns erected upon these northern harbours that must bridle them, and keep them in perpetual obedience.'


------


seems like many in British elite wanted to kill Irish, and this had been a pattern for many years

more broadly, hints that those involved in promoting famine were targetting the poor in general--potato was imported but only a few species, spread across europe and apparently became afllicted with genetic problems, became known as staple food for the poor. It was after this that the famine spread suddenly, to which these crops were susceptible.

At the same time, theories of malthus were used to justify slaughter of poor, and suspect people were taking helm of revolutions by poor against hated elite, which blossomed breifly around 1848 before being crushed. France became and empire again under Napaleon III.

Promoting global maladies that especially affect poor might be pattern among elite, including in recent times--for example, William Booth and contemporaries misinterpreted reports on global warming in press and sought to downplay alarm about it, and global warming is expected to be a calamity much more for the poor.

I guess a general pattern is they will promote calamities that aren't expected to affect them too much: war, famine, certain kinds of pestillence. e.g. in WWI iirc it was mostly the poor who got drafted, while the elite benefited by gaining new political power in anti-war effort, replacing old aristocricy with their people in revolutions 


although, hatred of the poor can't explain motivations entirely--British policies created poverty in Ireland in the first place, and some of the people who helped them were at least not rich. Global warming would also destroy many beach-front properties, a favorite of the rich. Logic would have it that the best way to "get rid of the poor" would not be to kill them but bring them prosperity and fortune. Under Communism, the reaction to laisaize-faire policies like this, technically nobody was "poor" yet the killings continued.


------


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Great_Famine_(Ireland)
	In January 1847, the government abandoned this policy, realising that it had failed, and turned to a mixture of "indoor" and "outdoor" direct relief; the former administered in workhouses through the Irish Poor Laws, the latter through soup kitchens. The costs of the Poor Law fell primarily on the local landlords, some of whom in turn attempted to reduce their liability by evicting their tenants,[73] a practice that was facilitated by the "Cheap Ejectment Acts".[75] 


a lot of the policies ended up causing emigration from ireland


	In June 1847 the Poor Law Amendment Act was passed which embodied the principle, popular in Britain, that Irish property must support Irish poverty. The landed proprietors in Ireland were held in Britain to have created the conditions that led to the famine.[76][77] However, it was asserted that the British parliament since the Act of Union of 1800 was partly to blame.[76] This point was raised in The Illustrated London News on 13 February 1847: "There was no law it would not pass at their request, and no abuse it would not defend for them." On 24 March, The Times reported that Britain had permitted in Ireland "a mass of poverty, disaffection, and degradation without a parallel in the world. It allowed proprietors to suck the very life-blood of that wretched race".[76] 


landlords and parliamente were blamed for creating conditions for famine at the time--what were charges?


	...Records show that Irish lands exported food even during the worst years of the Famine. When Ireland had experienced a famine in 1782–83, ports were closed to keep Irish-grown food in Ireland to feed the Irish. Local food prices promptly dropped. Merchants lobbied against the export ban, but government in the 1780s overrode their protests.[79] No such export ban happened in the 1840s.[80]

	Throughout the entire period of the Famine, Ireland was exporting enormous quantities of food. In the magazine History Ireland (1997, issue 5, pp. 32–36), Christine Kinealy, a Great Hunger scholar, lecturer, and Drew University professor, relates her findings: Almost 4,000 vessels carried food from Ireland to the ports of Bristol, Glasgow, Liverpool, and London during 1847, when 400,000 Irish men, women, and children died of starvation and related diseases. She also writes that Irish exports of calves, livestock (except pigs), bacon, and ham actually increased during the Famine. This food was shipped from the most famine-stricken parts of Ireland: Ballina, Ballyshannon, Bantry, Dingle, Killala, Kilrush, Limerick, Sligo, Tralee, and Westport. A wide variety of commodities left Ireland during 1847, including peas, beans, onions, rabbits, salmon, oysters, herring, lard, honey, tongues, animal skins, rags, shoes, soap, glue, and seed. The most shocking export figures concern butter. Butter was shipped in firkins, each one holding 9 imperial gallons; 41 litres. In the first nine months of 1847, 56,557 firkins (509,010 imperial gallons; 2,314,000 litres) were exported from Ireland to Bristol, and 34,852 firkins (313,670 imperial gallons; 1,426,000 litres) were shipped to Liverpool, which correlates with 822,681 imperial gallons (3,739,980 litres) of butter exported to England from Ireland during nine months of the worst year of the Famine.[81] The problem in Ireland was not lack of food, which was plentiful, but the price of it, which was beyond the reach of the poor.[82]

	The historian Cecil Woodham-Smith wrote in The Great Hunger: Ireland 1845–1849 that no issue has provoked so much anger and embittered relations between England and Ireland "as the indisputable fact that huge quantities of food were exported from Ireland to England throughout the period when the people of Ireland were dying of starvation".[83] John Ranelagh writes that Ireland remained a net exporter of food throughout most of the five-year famine.[84] However, both Woodham-Smith and Cormac Ó Gráda write that, in addition to the maize imports, four times as much wheat was imported into Ireland at the height of the famine as exported.[85][86] 


ended up exporting a lot of food during famine. Exports were stopped in famine of 1782-83 but this wasn't done for great famine


	...William Smith O'Brien—speaking on the subject of charity in a speech to the Repeal Association in February 1845—applauded the fact that the universal sentiment on the subject of charity was that they would accept no English charity. He expressed the view that the resources of Ireland were still abundantly adequate to maintain the population, and that, until those resources had been utterly exhausted, he hoped that there was no one in "Ireland who will so degrade himself as to ask the aid of a subscription from England".[46] 


O'Brien said Ireland would accept no English charity--why?

seems like some leaders in Irish independance movement at the time would make for a prop to harden hearts of English people


	...Landlords were responsible for paying the rates of every tenant whose yearly rent was £4 or less. Landlords whose land was crowded with poorer tenants were now faced with large bills. Many began clearing the poor tenants from their small plots, and letting the land in larger plots for over £4 which then reduced their debts. In 1846, there had been some clearances, but the great mass of evictions came in 1847.[98] According to James S. Donnelly, Jr., it is impossible to be sure how many people were evicted during the years of the famine and its immediate aftermath. It was only in 1849 that the police began to keep a count, and they recorded a total of almost 250,000 persons as officially evicted between 1849 and 1854.[99]

	Donnelly considered this to be an underestimate, and if the figures were to include the number pressured into "voluntary" surrenders during the whole period (1846–1854), the figure would almost certainly exceed half a million persons.[100] While Helen Litton says there were also thousands of "voluntary" surrenders, she notes also that there was "precious little voluntary about them". In some cases, tenants were persuaded to accept a small sum of money to leave their homes, "cheated into believing the workhouse would take them in".[98]

	West Clare was one of the worst areas for evictions, where landlords turned thousands of families out and demolished their derisory cabins. Captain Kennedy in April 1848 estimated that 1,000 houses, with an average of six people to each, had been levelled since November.[101] The Mahon family of Strokestown House evicted 3,000 people in 1847, and were still able to dine on lobster soup.[102]

	After Clare, the worst area for evictions was County Mayo, accounting for 10% of all evictions between 1849 and 1854. The Earl of Lucan, who owned over 60,000 acres (240 km2), was among the worst evicting landlords. He was quoted as saying that "he would not breed paupers to pay priests". Having turned out in the parish of Ballinrobe over 2,000 tenants alone, he then used the cleared land as grazing farms.[103] In 1848, the Marquis of Sligo owed £1,650 to Westport Union; he was also an evicting landlord, though he claimed to be selective, saying that he was only getting rid of the idle and dishonest. Altogether, he cleared about 25% of his tenants.[104]

	In 1847, Bishop of Meath, Thomas Nulty, described his personal recollection of the evictions in a pastoral letter to his clergy:

	    Seven hundred human beings were driven from their homes in one day and set adrift on the world, to gratify the caprice of one who, before God and man, probably deserved less consideration than the last and least of them ... The horrid scenes I then witnessed, I must remember all my life long. The wailing of women – the screams, the terror, the consternation of children – the speechless agony of honest industrious men – wrung tears of grief from all who saw them. I saw officers and men of a large police force, who were obliged to attend on the occasion, cry like children at beholding the cruel sufferings of the very people whom they would be obliged to butcher had they offered the least resistance. The landed proprietors in a circle all around – and for many miles in every direction – warned their tenantry, with threats of their direct vengeance, against the humanity of extending to any of them the hospitality of a single night's shelter ... and in little more than three years, nearly a fourth of them lay quietly in their graves.[105] 


landlords ended up evicting people who couldn't pay rent, many who would end up dead

irish independance movement had point in that if Irish got back their land, probably many lives could have been saved


	...The "Gregory clause", described by Donnelly as a "vicious amendment to the Irish poor law", had been a successful Tory amendment to the Whig poor-relief bill which became law in early June 1847, where its potential as an estate-clearing device was widely recognised in parliament, although not in advance.[78] At first, the poor law commissioners and inspectors viewed the clause as a valuable instrument for a more cost-effective administration of public relief, but the drawbacks soon became apparent, even from an administrative perspective. They would soon view them as little more than murderous from a humanitarian perspective. According to Donnelly, it became obvious that the quarter-acre clause was "indirectly a death-dealing instrument".[108] 


"Gregory clause" was that anyone occupying more than 1/4 acre of land was not eligable for relief

guy who put it in sketchy, also friends with many confederates before U.S. civil war


------


https://www.scientificamerican.com/article/why-malthus-is-still-wrong/
	If by fiat I had to identify the most consequential ideas in the history of science, good and bad, in the top 10 would be the 1798 treatise An Essay on the Principle of Population, by English political economist Thomas Robert Malthus. On the positive side of the ledger, it inspired Charles Darwin and Alfred Russel Wallace to work out the mechanics of natural selection based on Malthus's observation that populations tend to increase geometrically (2, 4, 8, 16 …), whereas food reserves grow arithmetically (2, 3, 4, 5 …), leading to competition for scarce resources and differential reproductive success, the driver of evolution.


"Essay on the Principle of Population" said to be influential by malthus


	On the negative side of the ledger are the policies derived from the belief in the inevitability of a Malthusian collapse. “The power of population is so superior to the power of the earth to produce subsistence for man, that premature death must in some shape or other visit the human race,” Malthus gloomily predicted. His scenario influenced policy makers to embrace social Darwinism and eugenics, resulting in draconian measures to restrict particular populations' family size, including forced sterilizations.

	In his book The Evolution of Everything (Harper, 2015), evolutionary biologist and journalist Matt Ridley sums up the policy succinctly: “Better to be cruel to be kind.” The belief that “those in power knew best what was good for the vulnerable and weak” led directly to legal actions based on questionable Malthusian science. For example, the English Poor Law implemented by Queen Elizabeth I in 1601 to provide food to the poor was severely curtailed by the Poor Law Amendment Act of 1834, based on Malthusian reasoning that helping the poor only encourages them to have more children and thereby exacerbate poverty. The British government had a similar Malthusian attitude during the Irish potato famine of the 1840s, Ridley notes, reasoning that famine, in the words of Assistant Secretary to the Treasury Charles Trevelyan, was an “effective mechanism for reducing surplus population.” A few decades later Francis Galton advocated marriage between the fittest individuals (“What nature does blindly, slowly, and ruthlessly man may do providently, quickly and kindly”), followed by a number of prominent socialists such as Sidney and Beatrice Webb, George Bernard Shaw, Havelock Ellis and H. G. Wells, who openly championed eugenics as a tool of social engineering.


malthus ideas combined with social darwinism and eugenics to justify things like forced sterilization policies



Trevelyan openly called famine a good thing from malthusian reasoning

Shaw and H.G. Wells also malthus fans?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/An_Essay_on_the_Principle_of_Population


seems pretty obvious causing a famine would only make the problem Malthus wrote about worse... what was up with Trevelyan? other "malthusians?"


------


"The Famine Plot:"


pg 13

	
	...Irish trade was crippled by the partial conquest. Instead of being developed, valuable cattle, fishing, and woolen industries were taxed out of existence when they came into competition with either British trading interests or her military concerns, which led her to disrupt Irish trade with both France and America.

	As a result, Ireland in the nineteenth century was a poverty-stricken land to which famine was a frequent visitor.


Seems doubtful policymakers actually acted out of belief in "laissez-faire" economic policies like Wikipedia says. There was also a food tariff that contributed to the famine that they didn't want to get rid of.

goes on to say Ireland had many famines, including 1741 famine that killed 1/8th of population 


	...At the time it was frequently said that the 1789 rebellion was secretly encouraged by direction of the English prime minister William Pitt so that it would go off half-cocked before the Society of United Irishmen could succeed in their aim of uniting Catholic, Protestant, and Dissenter against the Crown. Certainly English policy seemed directed at fermenting rather than aborting rebellion. 


worth looking at later--British empire supposedly pioneers in tyranny


	...The hatred of the Protestants for the Catholics was such taht the commanding English general Abercrombie became so revolted by the people he was defending that he had as little to do with them as he possibly could. For their part the Catholics occasionally responded to the floggings and hangings with atrocities of their own. In Scuallabogue in County Wexford for example, the insurgents burned down a church containing hundreds of captured Protestant women and children.


is this a pattern? Protestants rebel against catholic church, co-opted, become British Empire and hate Catholics; communists rebel against imperialism, co-opted, become Soviets and hate imperialists, etc. Like figure people won't suspect ideology doesn't mean beans to them


pg 19

	...The majority of the peasentry, perhaps as many as 3 million peopled, lived in conditions in which a considerate owner would not have placed a dog.

	The bulk of the peasants' accomodation consisted of mud cabins covered in straw or what was known as "scraws" cut from the top of bogs or rough fields. Any improvements to their holdings, either to the cabins or say to the drainage of their fields, would have resulted in rents being increased. The law was on the landlords' side, and the renters of land were tenants at will who could be ejected with ease from either large or small holdings.


couldn't improve land holding or rent increased


	...The peasentry reckoned that their lives could not possibly be worse married than unmarried and as a result something of a population explosion occurred. Between 1741, the date of the last big famine, and the coming of the blight in 1845 the population of Ireland *tripled.* Feeding so many was clearly a challenge.


this where malthusian arguments came from?

Britain population roughly tripled in same period, why no famine there?


pg 24

gang fights said to be going on before time of famine (anything interesting there?)


pg 25 tithe system in place like old Catholic church, led to "tithe war" in 1838

	
	...Faction fighting was a relatively short-lived and open form of violence. But agrarian violence, and its accompanying secret societies, was far more sinister and more widespread. Agrarian secret societies grew directly out of the appalling land situation. The powerful Caravat group, formed from landless men who wanted rents reduced and wages increased, fought with the Shanavests, who were generally representative of larger farmers and wanted to keep rents high and wages low.


"secret societies" also mentioned in wiki article, said they killed some landlords during famine

pg 29

says Dublin was more fancy, had an upper class


pg 32 London aware of poverty problem in Ireland, public debates on waht to do

	
	...The English debate discussed not merely how or whether to assist the poor but laissez-faire, the prevailing doctrine of non-interference with trade. The debate was influenced by widespread Victorian attitudes that poverty was a self-inflicted wound, incurred through bad habits.


this prevailing mood at the time? among some political factions I guess


	Political economists debated earnestly on the morality of aiding the poor because of the consequent risk of stultifying initiative and self-help among the lower orders. The real problem of course was cost, but the protagonists couched their arguments in moralistic terms. More and more as the debate progressed, one finds that the authorities cited by protagonists tended to lace their arguments with a dose of providentialism.

	Providence, the divine will, was declared to have a large bearing on the subject, as it generally does when the rich debate the poor, or the strong confront the weak. It was the era in which in America the indigenous Americans were going down before a similar doctrine: Manifest Destiny.


I guess concluded that povert and famine was "divine will" or something? see a lot of quotes like that


	A central figure in the debate was a classical economist. Nassau William Senior, the first professor of political economy at Oxford University, preached, among other things, that it was not the duty of the State to alleviate poverty that came about through the fault of the individual. English poor law owed a great deal to his theories and, during the Famine, Whig apologists would see to it that the idea of Irish culpability for Irish poverty would become widespread among the British public. "Lazy beds" was used as a term of derision to indicate that the Irish even brought their laziness to bear on their potato cultivation. Nassau Senior criticized Irish landlords for neglecting "the duty for the performance of which Providence created [them,] the keeping down population."


Nassau William Senior cited as important in debate, ideas used in arguments to British public that Irish responsible for poverty there

couldn't find much quoting him in newspaper search--more of a "behind the scenes" guy?


https://archive.org/stream/americanslavery00sumngoog/americanslavery00sumngoog_djvu.txt
	American slavery: repr. of an article [by N.W. Senior, entitled Slavery in the United States]

	...Publication date 1856 

	...The strife is no longer local, hut national. 
	Even now, while 1 spcuk, portents hang on all the 
	arches of the horizon, threatening to darken the broad 
	land, which already yawns with the mutterings of 
	civil war. The fury of the propagandists of Slavery, 
	and the calm determination of their opponents, are 
	now diffused from the distant territory over wide- 
	spread communities, and the whole country, in all 
	its extent — marshalling hostile divisions, and fore* 
	shadowing a strife, which, unless happily averted by 
	the triumph of freedom, will become war — fratricidal, 
	parricidal war — with an accumulated wickedness be- 
	yond the wickedness of any war in human annals ; 
	justly provoking the avenging judgment of Provi- 
	dence and the avenging pen of history


Nassau some kind of British foreign policy prophet?

he is really sketchy

although this was a speech by Charles Sumner in his book..


	...Mr. Sumner's speech will be made more intelligible 
	to an English reader by the following extract from a 
	sermon preached by the Kev. Dudley Tyng in Phila- 
	delphia, on the 29th June, 1856 : — 

	On that day more 
	than one thousand armed men from an adjoining 
	State invaded the Territory, drove judges and legal 
	voters from the polls, and, by fraudulent ballots, 
	elected a man of their own. On the 30th of March, 
	1855, the inhabitants of Kansas were to have elected 
	their Territorial Legislature. More than four thou- 
	sand armed men from the same State again invaded 
	the Territory, took possession of the polls and elected 
	their own candidates, some of them residents of their 
	own State. The recent investigations of the Con- 
	gressional Committee have proved that of five thousand 
	five hundred votes cast on that day, less than one 
	thousand were of actual residents of the Territory. 

	Surely it was bad enough tp see a Legislature im- 
	posed on them by force and fraud. But what sort of 
	laws did they pass ? Hear and ask yourselves whether 
	we live in the Nineteenth Century, and in a free and 
	Christian Republic. They re-enacted in a mass all 
	the slave laws of Missouri

	...Mr. Everett's appointment at St. James's hung in suspense because he was suspected of having uttered, somewhere, a sentiment hostile to slavery and its interests. The country is one vast Dionysius's ear. Every whisper in the closet is trasmitted and punished.

	Before parting to-night, let me ask any doubting friend, if there be one here, what provocation more he proposes to wait for? They have added slave states by a coup d'etat; will you wait until they have added Cuba or Central America ? They have tried to force slavery on Kansas; will you wait until they have succeeded ? They have violated one solemn compact; how many more must they violate, before you will assert your right? They have struck down a senator in his palce. Some of their presses have designated the next victim; will you wait until he has fallen >"

	Mr. Dana  was right. Mr. Brooks was not expeleld from the Senate. His only punishment was a fine of 300 dollars. This is the value set in Washington on freedom of debate. Any ruffian willing to pay 60l. may waylay and disable an opponent.

	THE END.


dunno what to make of this but weird how he wrote on it and seems like the kind of guy who would be happy to see civil war


here's a journal of his "conversations with distinguished persons": https://archive.org/stream/conversationswi02senigoog/conversationswi02senigoog_djvu.txt


his "science of political economy" book talked about population kindof like malthus:


https://archive.org/stream/in.ernet.dli.2015.274838/2015.274838.An-Outline_djvu.txt
	The Causes 'which Limit Population. 

	Having explained the sense in wMcii we use the word wealth, and 
	stated, or rather recalled to the recollection of our readers, the general 
	desire to obtain additional wealth with the least possible sacrifice, we 
	now proceed to consider the second of the four elementary propositions 
	on which the Science of Political Economy is founded ; namely, that 
	the population of the world, or, in other words, the number of persons 
	inhabiting it, is limited only by moral or physical evil, or by fear of 
	the deficiency of those articles of wealth which the habits of the 
	individuals of each class of its inhabitants lead them to require. 

	It is now generally admitted, indeed it is strange that it should 
	ever have required to he pointed out, that every species of plant or 
	animal which is capable of increase, either by generation or by seed, 
	must be capable of a constantly increasing increase ; every addition 
	to its numbers being capable of affording a source of still further 
	additions ; or, in other words, that wherever there is a capacity of 
	increase, it must he a capacity of increase not by mere addition, but 
	by multiplication ; or, to use the short foi*m in which the proposition 
	is usually stated, not in an arithmetical, but in a geometrical ratio.

	...that their number may double every twenty-five yeai's. 
	At this rate the inhabitants of every Country would, in the course of 
	every five centuries, increase to above a million times their previous 
	number, xlt this rate the population of England would, k five bun- 
	dred years, exceed fifteen million millions : a population wMcli would 
	not allow tliem standing room. Sueli being the human powers of 
	increase, the question is, By what checks is their expansion con- 
	trolled ? How comes it that the population of the world, instead of 
	being now a million times as great as it was five hundred years ago, 
	apparently has not doubled within that time, and certainly has not 
	quadrupled ? 

	Mr. Malthus has divided the checks to population into the preventive 
	and the positive. The first are those which limit fecundity, the 
	second those which decrease longevity. The first diminish the number 
	of births, the second increase that of deaths. And as fecundity and 
	longevity are the only elements of the calculation, it is clear that Mr. 
	Malthus’s division is exhaustive. The positive check to population is 
	physical evil. The preventive checks are pi’omiscuous intercourse and 
	abstinence from marriage. The first is moral evil; the second is, 
	with a very few exceptions, so few indeed that they do not affect the 
	result, founded on an apprehended deficiency of some of the things 
	to which we have given the general appellation of wealth. All the 
	preventive and positive checks may therefore be distributed under 
	prudence, moral evil, and physical evil. We will first consider the 
	positive check. 

	We have seen that this check includes all the causes which tend, 
	in any way, prematurely to shorten the duration of human existence : 
	such as unwholesome occupations, severe labour, or exposure to the 
	seasons, bad or insufficient food or clothing, bad nursing of children, 
	excesses of all kinds, the corruption of the air from natural causes, 
	or from large towns, wars, infanticide, plague, and famine. Of these, 
	some arise from the laws of nature, and others from the crimes and 
	follies of man : all are directly and immediately felt in the form of 
	physical evil, though many of them ai‘e the result, more or less 
	remotely, of moral evil. 

	The final and irresistible mode in which physical evil operates is 
	the -want of the necessaries of existence : death produced by hardship 
	or starvation. This is almost the only check to the increase of the 
	irrational animals ; and as man descends towards their condition, he 
	falls more and more under its influence. In the lowest savage state 
	it is the principal and obvious check ; in a high state of civilization it 
	is almost imperceptible ; hut is unperceived only in consequence of 
	the operation of its substitutes. 

	...Among nations imperfectly civilized, the widest and 
	the most wasting of the positive checks is predatory war. A district 
	exposed to it is likely to suffer all the others. Mere fear of invasion 
	must generally keep the great body of its inhabitants pent up in 
	crowded and consequently unwholesome towns ; it must confine their 
	cultivation to the fields in the immediate neighbourhood of those 
	towns, and, if it does not destroy, must so much impede their com- 
	merce as to render it useless as a source of subsistence ; and when 
	the invasion does come, it is often followed by the complete extirpation 
	of the in vaded community. This is the check wdiich has kept Africa, 
	and the central parts of Asia, in their comparatively unpeopled state. 

	...it is certain that if each 
	individual were to expend to the utmost extent of his means, the 
	whole capital of the Country vvould he gradually wasted away, and 
	general misery would he the result. But it appears equally certain, 
	that if each individual were to confine his expenditure to mere 
	necessaries, the result would be misery quite as general and as 
	intense. 

	We have seen that the powers of population, if not restrained by 
	prudence, must inevitably produce almost every form of moral and 
	physical evil. In tJie case which we are supposing’, the wants of 
	society would be confined to the food, raiment, and shelter essential 
	to the support of existence ; and they would all consist of the cheapest 
	materials. At present, among civilized nations, the cultivation of the 
	land employs only a portion of its inhabitants, and, generally speaking, 
	as a nation increases in wealth, a smaller and smaller proportion; in 
	England not one third ; and a great part of the labourers so employed 
	are producers of luxuries. Indeed, as potatoes afford a food five or 
	six times as ixbuudant as corn, and more than twenty times as abun- 
	dant as meat, and, as far as can he judged by the appearance and 
	poxvers of the lower Irish, quite as wholesome, meat and corn may be 
	considered luxuries, to the extent in which they are more expensive 
	than potatoes. Nor, consistently with the existence of private pro- 
	perty, and of the desire of xvealth, can the mode of cultivation he 
	directed to the obtaining the largest possible return. The object is 
	to obtain the largest return that is consistent with profitable farming ; 
	but, in the pursuit of this object, quantity of produce must often be 
	sacrificed to economy of labour or time. 

	If there were no desire for any thing beyond necessaries, both the 
	existing partition of the land, and the existing division of labour, would 
	be varied. No family would wish to occupy more land than the small 
	plot necessary to afford them potatoes and milk. Supposing them to 
	give to it the utmost nicety of garden cultivation, its management 
	wotfid still leave them time to produce the coarse manufactures 
	necessary for their own use. The whole of the population would be 
	agricultural. 761,348 families so employed at present in England, 
	althougli their labour is far from being directed to the production of 
	the greatest possible amount, provide, xvithout much assistance from 
	importation, subsistence for the whole of our 2,745,336 families. If 
	all were so employed, and if quantity of produce were their sole 
	object, it is probable that in ordinary seasons the soil of England, 
	instead of fifteen millions, could feed at least sixty millions of people ; 
	and that of Europe, instead of two hundred, eight hundred millions. 
	And that, in the absence of any checks more powerful than those 
	experienced in the United States of America, the population of 
	Europe might in fifty years amount to eight hundred millions. Indeed 
	it is probable that, under the circumstances which we are supposing, 
	the increase in Europe would be for a considerable time rather more 
	rapid than that which has taken place in America. Preventive checks 
	would not exist ; marriages could not be hindered or even delayed by 
	prudence, since there could he no reason to anticipate want ; the habit 
	of early marriages would put an end to profligacy ; and, as all oui' 
	habits would be eminently healthy, the positive checks would be 
	reduced to their minimum. 

	So far the picture is rather pleasing ; it exhibits a state of society, 
	not rich certainly, nor refined, but supporting a very numerous popu- 
	lation in health and strength, and in the full enjojinent of the many 
	sources of happiness connected with early marriage. But it is obvious 
	that this could not last for ever; it could not last indeed for two 
	hundred and fifty years. By that time the population of Europe 
	would amount to above three million millions ; a number which the 
	wildest imagination cannot conceive capable of existing simultaneously 
	in tlie w-hole earth. 

	Sooner or later, thcj'efore, the increase must bo checked ; ami we 
	have seen that prudence is the only cheek that does not involve vice 
	or misery. But such is the force of the passions which prompt to 
	marriage, and such is each man’s reliance on his own good conduct 
	and good fortune, that the evils, whatever they may ])e, the appre- 
	hension of wdiieli forms the prudential check, are frequently incurred. 
	Where that evil is the loss of luxuries, or even of decencies, it is 
	trifling in the first case, and bearable in the second. But, in the 
	case which we are supposing, the only prudential check would be an 
	apprehended deficiency of necessaries; and that deficiency, in the 
	many instances in which it would actually be incurred, would be the 
	positive check in its most frightful form. It would be incurred not 
	only in consequence of that miscalculation of chances to which all 
	men are subject, and certainly those not the least so who are anxious 
	to marry, but through accidents against which no human prudence 
	can guard. A single bad harvest may he provided against, but a 
	succession of unfavourable seasons (and such successions do occur) 
	must reduce such a people to absolute famine. When such seasons 
	afiect a nation indulging in considerable superfluous expenditure, they 
	are relieved by a temporary sacrifice of that superfluity. The grain 
	consumed in ordinary years by oiu- breweries ard distilleries is a store 
	always at hand to supply a scarcity, and the same may be said of 
	the large quantity of food raised for the support of domestic animals, 
	but applicable to buman subsistence. To those resources may be 
	added the importation from abroad of necessaries instead of luxuries 
	and the materials of luxury, of corn, for instance, instead of "wine. 


I think he's trying to say that supporting a large population comes at the expense of enjoyment for others


	...We believe that there are few portions of Europe the inhabitants of 
	which would not now be richer if their mimhers were fewer, and would 
	not he richer hereafter if they were now to retard the rate at which 
	•their population is increasing. No plan for social improvement can 
	he complete unless it embrace the means hotli of inereasing the pro- 
	duction of wealth and of preventing population from making a pro|)or- 
	tionate advance. The former is to he effected by legislative, tiio 
	latter by individual prudence and forethought. The former must he 
	brought about by the governing classes of society ; the latter depends 
	almost entirely on the lower.

	...It is obvious that if the present state of the world, compared Avith 
	its state at our earliest records, be one of relative poverty, the ten- 
	dency of population to increase more rapidly than subsistence must 
	be admitted. 


goes on to say America, Ireland, and China are too populous


	...It is not on the accidents of soil or climate, or on the existing 
	accumulation of the material instruments of production, hut on the 
	quantity and the diffusion of this immaterial capital, that the wealth 
	of a Country depends. The climate, the soil, and the situation of 
	IreUnd have been described as superior, and certainly are not much 
	interior, to our own. Her poverty has been attributed to the want of material capital; but were Ireland now to exchange her native 
	population for seven millions of our English North Countrymen, they 
	would quickly create the capital that is wanted. And were England, 
	North of Trent, to he peopled exclusively by a million of families from 
	the West of Ireland, Lancashire and Yorkshire would still more rapidly 
	resemble Connaught. Ireland is physically poor because she is morally 
	and intellectually poor, because she is morally and intellectually 
	uneducated. And while she continues uneducated, while the ignorance 
	and violence of her population render persons and property insecure, 
	and prevent the accuniulation and prohibit the introduction of capital, 
	legislative measures, intended solely and directly to relieve her poverty, 
	may not indeed be inetfectual, for they may aggravate the disease, the 
	symptoms of which they ai’e meant to palliate, but imdoubtediy fldll 
	be productive of no permanent benefit. Knowledge has been called 
	power; it is far more certainly wealth. Asia Minor, Syria, Egypt, 
	and the Northern coast of Africa, were once among the richest, and 
	are now among the most miserable Countries in the world, simply 
	because they have fallen into the hands of a people without a sufficiency 
	of the immaterial sources of wealth to keep up the material ones. 
	“In wbat way,” asks Adam Smith, ‘‘has Europe contributed to the 
	grandeur of the colonies of America ? In one \vay, and in one way 
	only, sbe has contributed a great deal. Magna vi'm77i mater. She 
	bred and formed the men who were capable of achieving such great 
	actions, and of la 3 dng the foundation of so great an empire ; and there 
	is no other quarter of the world of which the policy is capable of 
	forming, or has ever actually and in fact formed such men. The 
	colonies owe to Europe the education and great view's of their active 
	and enterprising founders, and some of the greatest and most important 
	of them owe to her scarce any thing else.” 


I think he's trying to say Ireland is poor and Britian is not as poor because Britain is better than Ireland


https://archiveshub.jisc.ac.uk/search/archives/9b2b079d-86fa-35c9-943f-e02fcf0375c3
	Correspondence, 1830-1863: Letters to Nassau William Senior from Richard Whately (Drummond Professor of Political Economy in the University of Oxford 1829-1831, and Archbishop of Dublin, 1831-1863), Lord Melbourne, Lord John Russell and others. Also contains letters from Nassau Senior to Archbishop Whatley, the Marquis of Landsdowne, Compte de Tocqueville and others. Among topics discussed or referred to are the property tax, the abolition of transportation, the state of the Irish poor and Irish affairs generally, the evils of the labour rate system, the national education system, the Corn Law question, the amendment of the Poor Law and the American Civil War.


things he was interested in


	...Nassau William Senior (1790-1864), economist, was born at Compton Beauchamp, Berkshire, educated at Eton and Magdalen College, Oxford from where he graduated in 1812. In 1819 he was called to the Bar and became one of the leading Classical economists of the period. He was a major contributor to economic theory and a proponent of laissez-faire. In 1825 he became the first Drummond professor of political economy at Oxford, holding the post till 1830 and again between 1847 and 1862. He was most influential in nineteenth century political affairs and an active participant in Whig politics; he was one of the commissioners responsible for the Poor Law Amendment Act of 1834. 


http://spartacus-educational.com/Lpoor1834.htm
	In 1833 Earl Grey, the Prime Minister, set up a Poor Law Commission to examine the working of the poor Law system in Britain. In their report published in 1834, the Commission made several recommendations to Parliament. As a result, the Poor Law Amendment Act was passed. The act stated that:

	(a) no able-bodied person was to receive money or other help from the Poor Law authorities except in a workhouse;

	(b) conditions in workhouses were to be made very harsh to discourage people from wanting to receive help;

	(c) workhouses were to be built in every parish or, if parishes were too small, in unions of parishes;

	(d) ratepayers in each parish or union had to elect a Board of Guardians to supervise the workhouse, to collect the Poor Rate and to send reports to the Central Poor Law Commission;

	(e) the three man Central Poor Law Commission would be appointed by the government and would be responsible for supervising the Amendment Act throughout the country.

	William Cobbett warned the legislators in the House of Commons that "they were about to dissolve the bonds of society" and to pass the law would be "a violation of the contract upon which all the real property of the kingdom was held". Cobbett particularly objected to the separation of families, and to workhouse inmates being forced to wear badges or distinctive clothing. Thomas Attwood argued that workhouses would become "prisons from the purpose of terrifying applicants from seeking relief". 


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Poor_Law_Amendment_Act_1834
	The Act has been described as "the classic example of the fundamental Whig-Benthamite reforming legislation of the period".[1] Its theoretical basis was Thomas Malthus's principle that population increased faster than resources unless checked, Thomas Malthus's "iron law of wages" and Jeremy Bentham's doctrine that people did what was pleasant and would tend to claim relief rather than working.[2]

    ...Of those serving on the Commission, the economist Nassau William Senior identified his ideas with Malthus while adding more variables, and Bishop John Bird Sumner as a leading Evangelical was more persuasive than Malthus himself in incorporating the Malthusian principle of population into the Divine Plan, taking a less pessimistic view and describing it as producing benefits such as the division of property, industry, trade and European civilisation.


------

"The Famine Plot:"

pg 33


	A Royal Commission, of which Nassau Senior was a member, issued a report in 1834, which became the New Poor Law Act of 1834. He was a confidant of the prime minister's and cabinet members and through his writings in such journals as The Edinburghe Review became one of the most influential voices raised in the great debate concerning how Irish poverty should be tackled. In England, Nassau Senior is remembered as being a very pleasant man who became a lifelong friend of, among others, Alexis de TOcqueveill, who was deeply sympathetic and insightful concerning Irish problems.

	In Ireland, however, he is chiefly remembered for a comment passed by the great English educationalist Benjamin Jowett, the Master of Balliol, who said that he had no time for political economists since he overheard Nassau Senior say that even if one million people were to die in the Irish famine it would do no good.

	Since the days of the Famine people have debated as to whether Nassau Senior's comments were either taken out of context, or whether they should be regarded as epitomizing official England's lack of feeling for Irish suffering. The latter would appear to be the case. We have the evidence of the prime minister responsible for dealing with the Irish catastrophe, Lord John Russel, to indicate that the million-deaths view was not confined to Nassau Senior but was widespread among his associates.

	Many years after the Famine had ended, Prime Minister Reussel wrote to his friend Chchester Fortescue MP on the improved state of Ireland at that time, 1868. He said:

		The remedies have been due partly to the divine Providence and partly to human exertions. Many years ago the Political Economy Club of London came, as I was told, to a resolution that the emigration of two million of the population of Ireland would be the best cure for her social evils. Famine and emigration have accomplished a task beyond the reach of legislation or government; and Providence has justly afflicted us by the spectacle of the results of the entire dependence on potato cultivation, and by the old fires of disaffection which had been lighted in the hearts of Irishmen, and are now burning with such freshness on the bank of the Hudson and the Potomac.



------


https://www.britannica.com/event/Great-Famine-Irish-history
	By the early 1840s almost half the Irish population—but primarily the rural poor—had come to depend almost exclusively on the potato for their diet. The rest of the population also consumed it in large quantities. A heavy reliance on just one or two high-yielding types of potato greatly reduced the genetic variety that ordinarily prevents the decimation of an entire crop by disease, and thus the Irish became vulnerable to famine. In 1845 a strain of Phytophthora arrived accidentally from North America, and that same year Ireland had unusually cool moist weather, in which the blight thrived. 


https://www.newspapers.com/image/409188973/?terms=potato%2Bdisease
	DISCUSSION ON THE FAILURE IN THE POTATO CROP.

	...He had made much inquiry into this subject, and found that the disease in potatoes was not confied to this country nor indeed to Europe. It existed in Germany, in North and South Russia, in Enmakr, in the United States, in North and South America--in short, the epidemic appears to have made the range of the world. When facts like these were known, they would see that the idea of curing the disease by importing potatoes from America was a very fallacious one; and it showed them that to cure it they must adopt some other fundamental principie.


https://www.nature.com/news/pathogen-genome-tracks-irish-potato-famine-back-to-its-roots-1.13021
	...Meanwhile, a team led by Tom Gilbert and Mike Martin, evolutionary geneticists at the University of Copenhagen, looked more closely at such genes after sequencing the nuclear genomes of five herbarium strains of P. infestans. In unpublished work, the team identified numerous genes that differ between the historical samples and modern strains, including many disease genes that were missing from the famine strains. Their work also suggests that P. infestans may have been exported to Europe more than once during the famine.


http://www.thegazette.com/2013/03/17/british-policy-worsened-potato-famine


...


https://www.nature.com/articles/ncomms3172
	These results are consistent with the hypothesis4,8 of introduction from a New World source of limited genetic diversity. In contrast to the three modern strains from the United States, contemporary European isolates did not segregate into a single lineage, indicating that introductions into Europe after the first outbreak likely came from multiple genetic sources that were closely related7,8.


https://www.smithsonianmag.com/history/how-the-potato-changed-the-world-108470605/
	By Charles C. Mann

	...Parmentier’s timing was good. After Louis XVI was crowned in 1775, he lifted price controls on grain. Bread prices shot up, sparking what became known as the Flour War: more than 300 civil disturbances in 82 towns. Parmentier tirelessly proclaimed that France would stop fighting over bread if only her citizens would eat potatoes. Meanwhile, he set up one publicity stunt after another: presenting an all-potato dinner to high-society guests (the story goes that Thomas Jefferson, one of the guests, was so delighted he introduced French fries to America); supposedly persuading the king and queen to wear potato blossoms; and planting 40 acres of potatoes at the edge of Paris, knowing that famished commoners would steal them.

	In exalting the potato, Parmentier unwittingly changed it. All of Europe’s potatoes descended from a few tubers sent across the ocean by curious Spaniards. When farmers plant pieces of tuber, rather than seeds, the resultant sprouts are clones. By urging potato cultivation on a massive scale, Parmentier was unknowingly promoting the notion of planting huge areas with clones—a true monoculture.

	...P. infestans preys on species in the nightshade family, especially potatoes and tomatoes. Scientists believe that it originated in Peru. Large-scale traffic between Peru and northern Europe began with the guano rush. Proof will never be found, but it is widely believed that the guano ships carried P. infestans. Probably taken to Antwerp, P. infestans first broke out in early summer 1845, in the West Flanders town of Kortrijk, six miles from the French border.


...


https://academic.oup.com/bioscience/article/66/12/1035/2646818
	Potato late blight was reportedly first observed on potatoes in the United States in 1843 in areas around the ports of Philadelphia and New York and spread within the eastern United States for several years before it was reported in Europe in 1845 (Bourke 1964).


this true? what were they meeting about in 1844?


mentioned disease in U.S., maybe talking about something different in Europe at the time:


https://www.newspapers.com/image/409188973/?terms=potato%2Bdisease
	Mr. Allison of Mearns (who spoke very inaudibly) said, he believed vegetable life was just like animal life, in so far as it would be injured by bad treatment. He had seen whole potatoes grow frequently where cut ones failed, though if the latter did not fail, they produced better crops than when whole. He also found that the potatoes were stronger for seed when they were reared from whole potatoes. If they were raised for two years from whole potatoes, his experience led him to believe that disease would be cured; they should just allow them to remain in the ground, and never touch them. [We regret that the low tone in which this excellent practical farmer spoke, prevented us catching many of his very important observations.]


Charles Lemon was also said to be investigating something that sounded like genetic defects, and in another article an angry-sounding person tried to argue that growing potatoes from "splits" defied common sense and urged people to grow from seed like Mr. Allison saying above. So, possible that the "disease" in potatoes at that time in Europe talked about in the above article was genetic defects from growing potatoes as monoculture, while the "disease" in the U.S. was the blight that eventually swept through these crops in 1845.

When and why did they start growing potatoes as monoculture? 

Charles C. Mann admits Parametier has some blame

apparently this was a matter of public debate as well leading up to the famine


https://evolution.berkeley.edu/evolibrary/article/agriculture_02
	Monoculture and the Irish Potato Famine: cases of missing genetic variation

	Drawing of starving familyLack of genetic variation in Irish potatoes contributed to the severity of the Irish potato famine, which devastated Ireland's population and economy. Today, evolutionary theory tells us that relying on crops with low genetic variation can lead to disaster. Heeding the warnings of scientists and history may help us prevent wide-scale crop devastation due to changing environmental conditions.

	Lumpers
	In the 1800s, the Irish solved their problem of feeding a growing population by planting potatoes. Specifically, they planted the "lumper" potato variety. And since potatoes can be propagated vegetatively, all of these lumpers were clones, genetically identical to one another.

	The lumper fed Ireland for a time, but it also set the stage for human and economic ruin. Evolutionary theory suggests that populations with low genetic variation are more vulnerable to changing environmental conditions than are diverse populations. The Irish potato clones were certainly low on genetic variation, so when the environment changed and a potato disease swept through the country in the 1840s, the potatoes (and the people who depended upon them) were devastated.

	 The importance of diversity
	The genetically identical lumpers were all susceptible to a rot caused by Phytophthora infestans, which turns non-resistant potatoes to inedible slime. Because Ireland was so dependent on the potato, one in eight Irish people died of starvation in three years during the Irish potato famine of the 1840s.

	Although the famine ultimately had many causes, the disaster would likely not have been so terrible had more genetically variable potatoes been planted. Some potatoes would have carried the right genes to make it through the epidemic, and more of the resistant varieties could have been planted in the years following the first epidemic. Later, scientists identified resistance genes in a potato from South America, where farmers have preserved the genetic variation of potatoes by growing many cultivated varieties alongside the potato's wild cousins. 


https://www.laboratoryequipment.com/news/2018/03/irish-potato-famine-dangers-monocultures-still-yet-be-learned
	The blight came in the fall of 1845. The fungus was identified as Phytophthora infesans, and specifically the HERB-1 strain, McLain said. Leaves on the plants first blackened and curled – and then the potatoes that were dug out of the ground shriveled and rotted quickly, making them inedible.

	Since all the potatoes were the same variety, the fungus spread quickly. A single plant had the capacity to infect thousands of other plants in a matter of several days.


more pointing to not let loose in Ireland until 1845--set up like tinder for wildfire




Irish farmers get bad advice?


Belfast News-Letter Sep 24, 1844:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/390563782/?terms=potato%2Bseeds
	ON POTATO FAILURES

	TO THE EDITOR OF THE FARMER'S GAZETTE

	"Who shall decide when doctors disagree."

	Sir--I perceive by your popular journal that the failure in the potato crop is exciting a very general interest, and various modes are suggested for their future prevention. Amongst many others I have been much amused by the result of the meeting of the Scottish seers in Glasgow, which, from the variety of opinions and the means proposed to remedy the evil, reminds me of the Scotch blacksmith's definition of metaphysics

	...Now, sir, as I prefer *practice* to *theory*, I shall, with your leave, give you the result of mine

	...I took a hint from your excellent publication to plant the potatoes whole, a foot asunder in the drills, which are two feet and a half distant. Those chosen were a medium size, which, if cut, would make two sets. This mode saved the trouble of cutting, which, if performed according to present practice, would be planted six inches asunder, which would amount to the same thing as to the quantity of seed.


Jun 29 1844

https://www.newspapers.com/image/401394966/?terms=potato%2Bfailure
	...In parts of Kerry there is a great failure inthe potato crop, and the oats, though generally in ear, is not more than seven inches high. The drill potatoes failed most; the ridge crops appear safe. --Limerick Chronicle

	We regret to learn that in very many parts of this country there has been a partial failure of the potato seed planted this spring. In some places after the stalks had sprung up they withered away; in other places the seed was dried up and withered; while again some som places the seed rotted.--Clare Journal


I think "drill potatoes" is planting by cloning?


Freeman's Journal Jul 6 1844:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/401395415/?terms=potato%2Bfailure
	...The failure of the potato seed has become, unhappily, very frequent of late in the west; but it has rarely been witnessed to a greater extent than in the present year. I have observed many fields in which by no means half the seed has germinated; and it was melancholy enough to see the poor people engaged the live-long day "sticking" potatoes in the place of this unproductive seed, with the hope that by leaving them in the ground to the end of the year the soil might not be entirely without produce.


something wrong with potato seeds in 1844? said seeds didn't grow so famrers ended up planting by cloning instead

	
	...the failure is to be attributed to more causes than one, whetehr, as some think, one of them be a gradual deterioration of the potato crops, or not. ...but, under the favour of a benign Providence, notwithstanding those unfavourable symptoms, which are cheifly confined to the crops of the poor man, there is a fair prosect in the great extent of the sowings of an abundant harvest.


The Freeman's journal Dec 12, 1843:

https://www.newspapers.com/image/401285679/?terms=potato%2Bfailure
	As to the general condition of the peasetry, they state--"Amongst the effects of this rapid increase of population, without a corresponding increase of remunerative employment, the most alarming though the most obviously to be expected is a deterioration of the food of the peasentry. Milk is become almost a luxury to many of them; and the quality of their potato diet is generally much inferior to what it was at the commencement of the present century. A species of potato called "the lumper" has been brough into general cultivation on account of its great productiveness, and the facility with which it can be raised from an inferior soil ...In many counties of Leinster, and throughout the provinces of Munster and Connaught, the lumper now constitues the principal food of the labouring peasantry, a fact which is the more striking when we consider the great increase of produce, togehter with its manifest improvement in quality which is anually raised in Ireland for exportation and for consumption by the superior classes." This is the account the Railway Commissioners give of their tables and the general condition of the people. 

	...we should persevere in a struggle for the simple Repeal, or any other might change which would be likely to relieve our people from the "lumper" potaot, and all the other attendants of universal misery which reduce this country alas! far beneath the level of a prospering one, and makes it tho most wretched on the face of the earth (loud cheering).


was lumper potato part of British policy?


more on British policy in Ireland: https://www.newspapers.com/image/401398633/?terms=potato%2Bfailure

1843 on dependence in Ireland on potatoes: https://www.newspapers.com/image/385245398/?terms=potato%2Bcut

1843 on church extracting tithes: https://www.newspapers.com/image/385246616/?terms=potato%2Bcut


this 1844 article saying "whatever is opposed to nature is wrong in practice" was telling farmers to plant potatoes whole instead of cutting the up and planting the slices: https://www.newspapers.com/image/393153035/?terms=potato%2Bdisease


https://www.thespruce.com/what-are-seed-potatoes-4120142
	The term "seed potato" can be a little misleading. Although potatoes do set seed, they do not grow true to seed. To get the variety of potato you want, you need to grow them vegetatively, meaning you re-plant a part of the actual potato. These pieces of potato are referred to as seed potatoes.
	Selecting Seed Potatoes

	Because potatoes are propagated vegetatively, any diseases from the prior year will be carried over.

	That's why it is so important to use disease-free seed potatoes. That means certified seed potatoes, rather than supermarket potatoes. Certified seed potatoes are certified by a government authority to be disease-free.

	However, even certified potatoes can contract disease once planted, especially diseases that are not apparent in the seed stage like ring rot or fusarium wilt. Still, at least you have a bit of an edge, with some disease tolerance.

	Any potatoes that have a soft spot, cracks or bruises or signs of rotting should be discarded. Start with the healthiest, strongest seed potatoes to avoid problems and guarantee a good harvest.
	What Exactly Do You Plant?

	You do not need to plant a whole, intact potato. Seed potatoes can be cut into pieces, as long as the pieces have at least one eye each. An "eye" is a bud that grows into a new plant. If you've ever kept your potatoes in the cabinet too long, you've probably seen them sprout.


http://articles.chicagotribune.com/1995-05-21/business/9505210533_1_seed-potatoes-late-blight-international-potato-center
	Throughout most of the world, potatoes are grown not from seed but from so-called seed potatoes, tubers saved from previous harvests or bought from dealers and then replanted the following spring. But seed potatoes have a lot of disadvantages, researchers say.

	It takes a ton of them to plant just 2 1/2 acres of potatoes. They must be stored at the proper-preferably cool-temperature, difficult in parts of the tropics. And even then, they're prone to degenerate and to sprout at inopportune times, as anyone who has ever reached for an aging spud from the refrigerator cold bin knows.

	More importantly, seed potatoes can carry diseases, like the deadly late blight that wilted crops in Ireland starting in 1845 and killed more than one million people.

	In recent years, a modern, tougher version of late blight fungus has returned to haunt modern potato growers. Originated in Mexico, it caught a ride on seed potatoes shipped to Europe in the 1970s and has since found its way back to the Americas, plaguing crops from Canada to Ecuador as well as in Europe and parts of Asia.

	Scientists today are developing new potato varieties resistant to the blight.

	But true seed may offer an even better solution to that and other problems of potatoes, turning them into a leading world food source for the 21st Century.

	"We're very excited," Zandstra said, toying with a glass jar full of the tiny sesame-like seeds. "People said we were crazy. But this is going to make a big contribution."

	Every potato plant produces flowers and seed pods, which look a lot like little green tomatoes. But few farmers have ever planted those seeds, and for good reason.

	First, potatoes grown from tubers are genetic clones of the parent tuber and therefore remarkably uniform. But potatoes grown from seed are the product of sexual reproduction between two different plants and so can vary wildly in size, shape and taste, a big problem for farmers seeking consistency.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Monoculture
	In Ireland, exclusive use of one variety of potato, the "lumper", led to the great famine. It was inexpensive food to feed the masses. Potatoes were propagated vegetatively with little to no genetic variation. When Phytophthora infestans arrived from the Americas in 1845 to Ireland, the lumper had no resistance to the disease leading to the nearly complete failure of the potato crop across Ireland. Had the farmers used multiple varieties of potato, the famine may not have occurred.


think what happened is almost all potatoes grown one strain, grew clones


https://davesgarden.com/guides/articles/view/4115
	European sailors first brought potatoes to the Canary Islands and from there to Europe and Asia (and back to North America). Since potatoes are propagated vegetatively, all European varieties of cultivated potatoes are believed to have sprung from the single strain bought to the Canary Islands.

	...This new, foreign plant was suspicious since it did not reproduce the familiar way, with normal seeds, but by vegetative starts now known as "seed potatoes." It looked a bit like someone with leprosy, and so was doubly mis-trusted.


something happened to "seeds" (which are actually small potatoes) in 1844 and that might have led to continue cloning what they had then


cutting seed also said to increase spreading disease:

https://cropwatch.unl.edu/potato/wound_healing_cutting_seed_tubers

http://www2.gnb.ca/content/gnb/en/departments/10/agriculture/content/crops/potatoes/diseases/seed_piece_decay.html
	Growers should plant healthy seed potatoes and avoid the use of physiologically old seed. Cutting of potato seed has the disadvantage that the cutting process spreads diseases from contaminated to healthy tubers and exposes the cut surfaces of tubers to soil borne disease organisms.

	Cut seed can be planted the same day in warm soil but for cold, wet soil conditions, cut seed should be cured first to heal the seed by storing at 10-15EC for 2 to 4 days under high humidity with good ventilation. Never store cut seed under closed, humid conditions. Seed cutting equipment should be sterilized or disinfected frequently, especially between different lots of seed potatoes. Hunter, Russet Burbank, Keswick and occasionally Sebago are quite susceptible to seed-piece decay.


seed potatoes today have to be certified by government to be disease-free. Could be a vector to spread disease depending on where Irish farmers got their seed potatoes.


https://davesgarden.com/guides/articles/view/4115
	P. infectans was reported in New York and Philadelphia in 1843, and in early 1845 appeared in a shipment of seed potatoes for Belgian farmers.

	The 1845 autumn crop failed, but the Irish were accustomed to having crops fail occasionally. Due the nature of P. infectans, mutating readily and staying alive and contagious in the soil without a host plant, after the first bad harvest things went from bad to worse to horrifying in Ireland. For one thing, there wasn't an uninfected supply from which to draw the next year's seed potatoes.

	Because Ireland had been growing only S. tuberosa 'Irish Lumper' during the famine period and propagating seed potatoes that were genetically clones of the parent plant, there were no genes for resistance were bred in to 'Irish Lumper'.


according to this, transported in early 1845 in seed potato shipment for Belgian farmers

Irish used seed potatoes from previous harvest so grew clones, had only infected potatoes for next years harvest after 1845 (why didn't they get a shipment of uninfected seed potatoes?)


	...Other countries also experienced potato crop failures in the the middle of the 19th century, but only Ireland relied so heavily on the potato for nutrition that crop failure meant disaster. "Black '47" is what they called the worst year of the disaster; "over one million had died from malnutrition, slow starvation, rampant disease and escalating despair that did not abate until 1852."


this is point where they could have avoided bulk of the deaths--after realizing crop was infected in 45, could have switched to different crop, different kind of potato or uninfected potato, but didn't



https://www.potatoesincanada.com/traits-genetics/the-lumper-a-humble-potato-that-changed-history-13708#
	Currie first learned about the Lumper when she was asked to be one of the potato specialists in a proposed docudrama about the Irish potato famine. Potatoes, which are native to South America, were brought to Ireland by the late 1500s. By the early 1800s, millions of poor Irish people relied on potatoes as their only crop and only significant food source. Then in 1845, late blight struck the Irish potato crop. It wiped out almost half the crop that year and nearly the whole crop the next year. During the six years of the famine, more than a million people died from starvation and related diseases, and another million emigrated.

	The Lumper was the variety eaten by Ireland’s poor and also the variety most affected by late blight at the start of the outbreak.


Lumper most affected by outbreak--could have just seeded with different potato for next harvest?


http://www.bbc.co.uk/guides/zqqqmp3
	The deadly potato blight invaded Ireland via imported seed potatoes. It fell on a society uniquely vulnerable to the loss of this single crop – about half the population depended on the potato for survival.


imported seed potatoes said to be how blight got to Ireland


http://www.historyplace.com/worldhistory/famine/hunger.htm
	In the fall of 1847, the third potato harvest during the Famine brought in a blight-free crop but not enough potatoes had been planted back in the spring to sustain the people. The yield was only a quarter of the normal amount. Seed potatoes, many having been eaten, had been in short supply. 


blight free crop fall 1847, but not enough seed potatoes planted in spring. Seed potatoes were eaten before spring 1847. 1847 said to be worst year of famine.


http://sciencenordic.com/potato-famine-genome-secrets-unlocked
	Gilbert finds it natural to interpret this as if the new disease variants have entered the stage on a continuous basis – probably via seed potatoes, which the desperate European potato farmers had received from America hoping to find a resistant variant.


got seed potatoes from America?


https://wol.jw.org/en/wol/d/r1/lp-e/102002726
	Encouraged by a successful crop in 1847, farmers trebled the acreage of potato planting in 1848. Then came catastrophe! That summer proved to be very wet. Blight struck once more. The crop was lost for the third time in four seasons. Government agencies and charities were stretched to the breaking point. Even then, the worst was not over. In 1849 a cholera epidemic claimed the lives of a further 36,000.


why was 1847 crop good but not 1848 crop?

...


https://www.historyinthemargins.com/2016/05/13/the-not-just-irish-potato-famine/
	In a recent blog post, I made a reference to the Irish Potato famine, started to link to the prior post I was sure I had written on the subject, and was stunned to realize that blog post existed only in my imagination.* Allow me to rectify that error.

	When the Spanish imported potatoes from Peru in the sixteenth century, Europe’s peasants embraced the new crop as a miracle food. They could be planted in fallow fields, produced more food per acre than existing grain crops, and could be left in the ground until you needed them, making them less of a target for plundering soldiers in times of war. For much of Europe, the new crop meant a better diet for the poor and a reduced chance of famine.

	In Ireland, however, potatoes were soon linked with political and economic oppression. After Cromwell invaded in 1649, the English relocated the native Irish to the western provinces, where it was too wet to grow grain. Unable to grow grain themselves and unable to afford imported grain, Ireland’s peasants built a subsistence economy based on the potato. Like all one-crop economies, it was a disaster waiting to happen. Enter the “hungry ’40s”.

	Widespread failure of grain crops between 1845 and 1847 created food shortages across Europe, made worse by the potato blight of 1845. European grain prices increased between 100 and 150 percent over the course of two years, drastically affecting the standard of living for both peasants and urban workers, the later of whom typically spent seventy percent of their income on food. Food riots were common, escalating into violence directed at local landlords, tax collectors and factory owners. The crisis in agriculture was accompanied by industrial and financial collapse, which in turn led to widespread unemployment and greater unrest. In 1848, armed rebellions occurred in France, Austria, Prussia and most of the smaller German and Italian states , caused in part by the food shortages.

	Ireland was the hardest hit by the potato blight. Potatoes had never displaced grain and mixed farming on the Continent or in England. Only Ireland depended on potatoes for survival, its population reduced to abject poverty by English laws that limited the right of the Irish to own land in their own country. When the blight struck, most Irish had no food reserves. Much of Europe was hungry; Irish peasants suffered from a largely artificial famine.

	By October, 1846, ninety percent of the Irish potato crop had been lost. By December, potato prices had doubled. Absentee landlords allowed their agents to evict farmers who could not pay their rent, exacerbating the effects of the blight by further reducing harvests. An epidemic of typhus killed 350,000 from a population that was already weakened by starvation.

	Throughout the five years of the famine, Ireland remained a net exporter of food. The potato crop failed, but other crops thrived. Irish grain and cattle were exported to England as if nothing were wrong. Prime Minister Robert Peel pushed through the repeal of the Corn Laws, which taxed grain imports at a high rate, in an effort to help the starving Irish. He was forced to resign and replaced by Lord John Russell, a proponent of laissez-faire economics, who declared, “we cannot feed the people” and demanded that Irish relief be paid for by the starving Irish themselves.

	Committees of volunteers set up relief projects and soup kitchens. Donations came in from places as unlikely as Calcutta, Jamaica, and the Choctaw Indian tribe. By the summer of 1847, over three million people were being fed in soup kitchens. It wasn’t enough to combat the “Great Hunger”. Ireland lost one quarter of its population to the shortage of food and the unwillingness of the British government to provide public relief. About one million Irish died of starvation and disease between 1845 and 1851. Another million, the youngest and strongest, emigrated to America, Britain and Australia where, like new immigrant populations before and after them, they faced discrimination in jobs and housing.**

	*Hmmm. Imaginary Blog Posts–it has a certain ring doesn’t it?

	**Interestingly, the middle class German radicals who fled to the United States after the revolutions of 1848 enjoyed a warmer welcome.


concurrent with grain shortages throughout europe, 90% of potato crop lost in Ireland 1846, evections also contributed to famine since land unworked


https://www.independent.ie/irish-news/ancient-potatoes-hold-key-to-famine-mystery-28813213.html
	The failure of the potato crop, a staple part of the Irish diet, resulted in the deaths of one million people through starvation and forced a million more to emigrate.

	If the same information was available today, farmers and smallholders would be advised to harvest the crop, eat or sell it but not store any seed potatoes for planting the following year.

	Instead, new blight-free seed potatoes would be sourced, eliminating the problem.

	"In the 1840s, they didn't even know it was caused by a fungus," Professor Bruce Fitt from the University of Hertfordshire said.

	"The problem, as I understood it, was the crop was grown by smallholders. If they destroyed the crop, they would starve.

	"In the 1840s, they really didn't understand that it (blight) was caused by a micro-organism," Professor Fitt added.


according to professor Fitt they didn't realize that diseased seed-potatoes would have the same disease


Famine Plot:

https://books.google.com/books?id=x3HEH2XvUZ8C&q=seed+potato#v=snippet&q=seed%20potato&f=false
	He noticed the similarity of the disease to whet burnt and treated the potato seed as he did wheat, steeping it in a solution of bluestone copper sulphate and water. The potatoes remained healthy and Fitzgerald decided that the potato blight was a fungujs that could be treated. his letter of February 1846 to Dublin Castle detailing his experiments was ignored by the chief secretary. ...His experiments, had they been acted on, would probably not have been in time to greatly affect the course of events in 1846, but they might have prevented, or at least greatly alleviated, the horrors what, as we shall see, became justifiably known as "Black '47."


...


https://books.google.com/books?id=x3HEH2XvUZ8C&q=seed+potato#v=snippet&q=seed%20potato&f=false
	...Encouraged by the good results from the small percentage of seed potatoes sown in 1847, the already impoverished people pawned or solde everything they still possessed--clothes, bedding, furniture--in order to plant potatoes in every conceivable scrap of land. All over the country people planted many times the amount of seed that had been set the previous year. Very few green crops were sown. Reliance on the potato was greater than ever before. The corresponding distress caused by the reappearance of the blight was also proportionately greater.


why did blight return in 1848?


http://www.maggieblanck.com/Mayopages/Famine.html

says 3/4th lost 1846, 1/3rd lost 1848


http://www.waterfordmuseum.ie/exhibit/web/Display/article/330/2/Desperate_Haven__The_Famine_in_Dungarvan_Overture_to_Disaster_1845.html

first noticed June 1845 in Belgium, first reported Sep 1845 in Ireland


https://www.irishecho.com/2011/02/hibernian-chronicle-the-potato-blight-strikes-2/
	The first reports of disease among the potatoes of Ireland came from the Botanic Garden in Dublin in late August 1845. By September, the blight spread to farms in the northeast, eventually destroying one third of the potato crop. In 1846, the blight reappeared in June and spread at a rate of fifty miles per week to all 32 counties, destroying nearly 90 percent of the crop. Although the loss of just 30 percent in 1847 seems small, it was equally devastating because farmers had planted so few potatoes. Half the potato crop of 1848 fell to the blight. Between 1849 and 1852, smaller, localized outbreaks of the blight occurred, primarily in the south and west.

	The blight was not confined to Ireland. Indeed, the first reports of the blight in Europe came from Belgium in June 1845. By September it appeared not only in Ireland, but also in parts of England, Scotland, France, the Netherlands, Germany, Scandinavia, and Russia.


this says first reported in Botanic Garden in Dublin August 1945, destroyed 1/3rd crop 1845, 90% 1846, 30% 1847 (after planting few potatoes)

in 1845 spread to farms in northeast

in 1846 spread to all counties at rate of 50 miles per week


does this make sense? spread localized to northeast in 1845, everywhere 1846, nowhere 1847, again in 1848


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Phytophthora_infestans
	During the First World War, all of the copper in Germany was used for shell casings and electric wire and therefore none was available for making copper sulfate to spray potatoes. A major late blight outbreak on potato in Germany therefore went untreated, and the resulting scarcity of potatoes led to the deaths of 700,000 German civilians from starvation.[46]

	France, Canada, the United States, and the Soviet Union researched P. infestans as a biological weapon in the 1940s and 1950s.[47] Potato blight was one of more than 17 agents that the United States researched as potential biological weapons before the nation suspended its biological weapons program.[48] Whether a weapon based on the pathogen would be effective is questionable, due to the difficulties in delivering viable pathogen to an enemy's fields, and the role of uncontrollable environmental factors in spreading the disease.


also caused famine killing 700,000 in Germany

researched as biological weapon--what did that find?


https://www.nytimes.com/2008/03/17/opinion/17reader.html
	The warm damp spring of 1845 enabled late blight to become an epidemic. By mid-July, the disease had spread throughout Belgium and into the Netherlands. It went on to infect an area from northern Spain to the southern tips of Norway and Sweden, and east to Northern Italy. It moved inexorably through the British Isles and reached Connemara, on Ireland’s west coast, in mid-October. The ruin of Europe’s potato crops was complete.

	Nothing like it had been known before. Neither the Vandal hordes nor the bubonic plague had penetrated Europe so deeply and so fast. The failure of the crop was a disaster for every farmer, market gardener and family in Europe that relied on potatoes. Few were unaffected; in Ireland, a population that in 250 years had grown from one million to more than eight million, solely because of the potato’s unrivaled quality as a staple food, was threatened with starvation.


https://books.google.com/books?id=PP-HDAAAQBAJ&pg=PA148&lpg=PA148
	According to the report, after dissemination of this agent the following results might be expected:

		Phytophthora infestans is a pathogen capable of rapid multiplication under favourable field conditions. The period between infection and sporulation is less than one week, under very favourable conditions, therefore it would be possible to have 100% infection in a field in one month after inoculum was introduced to a single plant. While heavy application of inoculum would decrease the time for the disease to develop epidemic proportions, scattered primary inoculation would be effective if favourable whether persisted.


rate it would spread imporant--this said 100% infection in a month, periodbetween infection and shooting spores "less than one week, under very favourable conditions", said to spread 50 miles a week in 1846

does this match up?

otherwise I guess would point to infected seed potatoes, maybe could work out how infection spread and from where


	Once released into the environment further factors would, however, influence the survival of the pathogen. Fluctuations in temperature and relative humidity, and excessive rain and sunlight could all act to reduce the viability of the pathogen to a matter of several days making difficult accurate preditions of the life ot eh pathogen in the pellet.

	...The development of the porous pellet for Phytopthora infestans was considered to be a less than satisfactory means of dissemination and successful application of this agent to a target crop would require accurate weather forecasting in order that dissemination could be timed to coincide with the start of rainy periods that could be predicted to last more than one day.


says weather important, rain and humidity helps it spread, biological attacks would be timed with weather


https://www.researchgate.net/publication/315619309_The_rate_of_spread_of_late_blight_Phytophthora_infestans_Mont_de_Bary_under_varying_conditions_arable_field
	...Leaf infection with Phytophthora infestans was accepted as dependent variable y. First symptoms of Ph. infestans were observed
	at 52-59 days after emergency depending on study year and 50-81 days depending on variety. Applied model of multiple
	regression analysis to evaluate the dependence of some potato traits on meteorological and some soil elements of cultivation field
	appeared to be the most helpful for potato blight spreading rate.


this says takes about a month to show symptoms



https://apsjournals.apsnet.org/doi/pdf/10.1094/PHYTO.2001.91.12.1189
	As long as P. infestans remains exclusively asexual in a production region, there are two primary mechanisms by which the oomycete can occur in a field: via infected tubers (either surviving from the previous year or unintentionally plant- ed) and via aerial transport of sporangia from outside sources. Long-distance transport of infected tubers by people is well docu- mented, and several forecasting systems predict with varying accuracy the initial occurrence of late blight when infection comes from a soilborne tuber. Currently lacking is a method to predict quantitatively whether sporangia from a source outside a field will be transported to that field, and if transported, whether those sporangia will initiate di- sease.

	...The present study has demonstrated that wind speeds of 1 to  2 m s–1 are sufficient to remove a sizeable proportion of P. infes-tans sporangia from a potato canopy. These same wind speeds can transport sporangia for 10 to 20 km in less than 3 h.


can stay in tuber over year and infect when planted, or spread through air in spores. Spores can be transported by wind 10 to 20 km in less than 3 hours.


https://481502a3-a-62cb3a1a-s-sites.googlegroups.com/site/bellagiolbnov2009/workshop/background-information/economic-health-impacts/1164027566JudelsonNature2005.pdf?attachauth=ANoY7cq_4VNYw28Vx5MipuX7M_EIObTJV5rrYXZKsjyrq-yDPExUgVCKFaKTjS6dHlsWnHl81IhvBBOV1YoZKfKG2emMyHUhVvUiuj5Q5AcAQHTTgMPNOumSqPwlvLOCY98Yv-vpY8NxdhKU6aeK4RY6YnjnE0eJluCAAiFnQ56uwZ3_7OynA-tS0snLFu-sXTocm2ueJN6QuzkSMnNh0zl6xIGYCwQnJcTjzcz01I-trZNyiRLPHjkMPClY9xcTy5rzWAHF46en4hYE4pu6XAuuDepM-zkgBf5uZrH0q5hieVsv_EiTcnbLBCvziI8AVd8UzT0OPp8d&attredirects=0
	...The asexual sporangia have a remarkable ability to germinate by two different pathways. At higher tem- peratures (>14 ° C for  P. infestans ), direct germination occurs, in which hyphae emerge through the sporangial wall. Plant colonization can then occur through open- ings in a host such as a  STOMATE , LENTICEL or wound. I ndirect germination — also known as zoosporogenesis — is predominant at cooler temperatures. Both germi- nation pathways require the sporangia to be immersed in liquid, and are inhibited at high spore concentra- tions.


plant wounds and water help it spread by 


	...In particular, the motile zoospores extend the range of Ph y tophthora beyond the landing sites of airborne sporangia. Zoospores can remain motile for several hours or even days, and can move >6 cm through water films and farther in surface water 42,43 .There fore, a spo- r angium that lands some distance from a plant can still infect a host by travelling to stems or leaves that are in co ntact with soil, or to roots or tubers .


spores can swim through water to infect plant if it lands near one


http://botit.botany.wisc.edu/toms_fungi/m2001alt.html
	whiplash and tinsel flagellaPhytophthora infestans (pronounced fy-TOF-thor-uh in-FEST-ans) is a rather common pathogen of potatoes wherever they are grown, but it is usually not a problem unless the weather is unusually cool and wet. The water is necessary for the spores to swim to infect the leaves of the potatoes; the tubers and roots of the potato are more resistant to the pathogen. The name, meaning "infesting plant destroyer" is especially appropriate, because under the right conditions and with the correct susceptibility genes in the host, Phytophthora can kill off a field of potatoes in just a few days! 


this says can kill off a field of potatoes in a few days


https://apsjournals.apsnet.org/doi/pdfplus/10.1094/PHYTO-06-09-0148
	Invasion of Phytophthora infestans at the Landscape Level: How Do Spatial Scale and Weathe r Modulate the Consequences of Spatial Hete rogeneity in Host Resistance?

	Peter Skelsey, Walter A. H. Rossing, Ge ert J. T. Kessel, and Wopke van der Werf

	...The aerial spread of pathogen inoculum to uninfected hosts is crucial to the epidemic phase of potato late blight (18,19,46). Thus, epidemic development is a spatial process; or, more specifically, a combination of spa tial processes with length scales ranging from a few millimeters to several kilometers or more. Host encounter by dispersing spores is highly dependent on me-teorological conditions and the spatial characteristics of crops and landscapes. Variation in meteorological driving forces and heterogeneity in the structure of host populations are therefore of fundamental importance to the epidemic process. The paucity of quantitative data concerning spatial aspects of the disease cycle beyond the field scale is due to the difficulty of conducting ex-periments at large spatial scales, beyond the plot, and to the diffi-culty of unraveling the complex interplay between meteorological and spatial variables. Due to lack of knowledge at large spatial scales, the potential landscape dimension of potato late blight epi-demics has been scarcely incorporated into integrated crop pro-tection strategies. It is possible that knowledge of the spatial epi-demiology of the pathogen could be used to improve local and regional management of the disease and reduce the need for fungicides. 


says arial spread important, length scales millimeters to kilometers, depends on whether, lack of knowledge on how it is spread between fields.


	...Zwankhuizen et al. (54), using DNA fingerprinting, showed that P. infestansa spread from infested crops over an area of 25 km 2 in a period of 2 weeks. In one instance, sporangia of P. infestans from a refuse pile were found or inferred to infect potato fields up to 900 m away.


one study found infesting crops over area of 25 square km in 2 weeks


	...Disease dynamics in 6.4-by-6.4-km regions with homo- geneous fields. Potato fraction. Disease incidence increased by a factor 3.5 if the proportion of potato was increased from 1/64 to 1 (Fig. 3A). This result highlights the inherent vulnerability result- ing from growing potato in concentrated growing regions. Susceptible fraction. Increasing the susceptible fraction of potato plants from 1/64 to 1 increased incidence by a factor of 13.5 (Fig. 3B). Therefore, increased diversification of resistance genes within susceptible monoculture systems emerges as a highly effective spatial stragey for suppression of epidemics.


growing susceptible potatoes in concentrated growing regions was found to increase spread by a lot in a computer model


	...The results of the two-region scenarios act to confirm the scant information in the literature on the large capacity of P. infestans for long-distance dispersal (27,44,54). The use of space as an isolation barrier was effective in these scenarios, while the effi- cacy of this strategy was modulated by the spatial scale of mixing of potato cultivars. When growing regions were composed of fields that were planted with either a resistant or a susceptible cultivar, separation distances greater than those tested (32 km) were required to prevent the spread of disease from one region to another. In contrast, when the susceptible and resistant cultivars were mixed within fields, as cultivar mixtures, the minimum sepa- ration distance to completely prevent disease spread decreased to 32 km.


model said trying to grow potatoes in dense fields far apart made things worse, but the information available says space as an isolation barrier can be effective. The model found that for susceptible potatoes, barriers >32 km were needed.


https://apsjournals.apsnet.org/doi/pdfplus/10.1094/PHYTO.1998.88.8.754
	Development of Potato Late Blight Epidemics: Disease Foci, Disease Gradients, and Infection Sources Maarten J. Zwankhuizen, Francine Govers, and Jan C. Zadoks

	...Infection sources. Both field observations and characterization of isolates suggest that infested refuse piles were major infection sources for the development of late blight epidemics in Southern Flevoland in the spring of 1994 and 1995. The decrease in number of infested refuse piles over the years was probably caused by reduced tuber infections in the autumn of 1994 and 1995, c ompared with 1993. The majority (74%) of fields with early foci was asso- ciated with nearby infested refuse piles and, in most cases, puta- tive sources and targets had the same genotypes. Ninety-one per- cent of the isolates from the refuse piles collected in 1994 and 1995 belonged to the predominant genotypes NL-41, NL-69, NL-75, and NL-76 (M. J. Zwankhuizen, T. van der Lee, F. Govers, and J. C. Zadoks, unpublished data ). The majority (70%) of isolates col- lected in the commercial fields also belonged to these genotypes. 

	In 1994, five infested refuse piles were found in the Nz-section of Southern Flevoland (Fig. 2), which equals 0.2 infection sources per km 2 (25 ha of potatoes). This relatively low density of initial infection sources resulted in a general occurrence of late blight in June. Van der Zaag (27), J. C. Zadoks and H. Lohuis ( unpublished data ), and J. C. Zadoks and L. C. Davidse ( unpublished data ) identi- fied 1, 1.5, and 0.7 foci per km 2 , respectively. Although other sources cannot be excluded in our study (e.g., infected seed tubers or undetected infested refuse piles), the occurrence of a general epidemic can be explained by the presence of the few initial foci found in infested refuse piles. Most infested refuse piles were found before the time growers began to apply fungicides (i.e., the first week of June). The putative increase in pathogenic fitness of the new P. infestans population (8,22) may have contributed to a rapid spread of disease.

	Van der Zaag (27) found one focus per km 2 originating from an infected seed tuber in potato fields. He also identified 0.2 infested refuse piles per km 2 . For only one potato field was the distribution of the disease in the field found to be associated with an infested refuse pile. He concluded that refuse piles were of minor impor- tance. Boyd (4), J. C. Zadoks and H. Lohuis ( unpublished data ), and J. C. Zadoks and L.C. Davidse ( unpublished data ) found infested refuse piles to be the major infection sources, with little or no indications that infected seed tubers had contributed signifi- cantly to disease development. However, other studies indicate that the contribution of infected seed tubers cannot be excluded. The results of Hirst and Stedman (19) suggest that foci can develop from diseased tubers by infection of above-ground plant parts via spores originating from diseased tubers and passing through the soil without invading stems. In addition, several population studies showed that seed tubers can be important as an infection source (7,14,17). Moreover, our own studies (M. J. Zwankhuizen, T. van der Lee, F. Govers, and J. C. Zadoks, unpublished data ) indicate that infected seed tubers might play a role in the development of disease in organic crops.


there was a blight outbreak in the Netherlands in 1990's and researchers debated same thing... was it infected refuse piles downwind, or infected seed tubers?


https://ristainolab.cals.ncsu.edu/files/2015/10/Ristaino-JB-Gumpertz-ML-NEW-FRONTIERS-IN-THE-STUDY-OF-DISPERSAL.pdf
	...These kinds of field studies are very labor intensive. For this reason there are still relatively few good examples in the literature of quantitative analysis of spatial pattern of Phytophthora epi- demics over time (54, 62, 65, 100, 103, 104, 136). The paucity of information on the spatial dynamics of inoculum dispersal and disease spread has hindered our ability to develop more sustainable management strategies for many Phytophthora diseases.

	...Aerial dispersal of inoculum from sporulating lesions on leaves, stems or fruit to other parts of plants within and between fields is a major mechanism of dispersal for Phytophthora species that infect primarily above ground portions of plants (mechanism IV). For P. infestans on potato, new foci will develop and overlap both within and across many rows and the rate of disease increase can be rapid (136).  Sporangia of P. infestans do not survive under conditions of long-distance dispersal since sporangia viability is decreased under dry conditions. Short-range aerial dispersal has been reported for sporangia of P. infestans.

	...Spatial patterns of late blight epidemics on local and regional scales were stud- ied using a combination of spatially referenced data and genetic markers to make inferences concerning dispersal of the pathogen from primary inoculum sources (2, 89, 136). In one study in the Netherlands,  inoculum sources were identified using a combination of disease gradient analyses, spatially referenced mapping, and  DNA  fingerprinting  of  isolates  (136).  Most  of  the  sources  of  inoculum  in conventional potato fields originated from nearby refuse piles that were upwind of  conventional  fields  (136).   Aerial  dispersal  of P.  infestans from  34  to  over 3000 m was documented from refuse piles to fields. Infested organic potato fields also  were  implicated  as  a  source  of  inoculum  for  aerial  dispersal  of P.  infes- tans into nearby conventional fields in one season (136).  A region gradient was monitored across fields and data indicated that genotype-specific sources of in- oculum that differed in aggressiveness were dispersed among fields.

	...CONCLUSIONS

	Phytophthora species can be dispersed by one of several mechanisms. An under- standing of these mechanisms of dispersal has led to the development of novel management strategies in the field. Dispersal in soil, via surface water, by rain splash, by air, or via human or insect activity are the major dispersal mechanisms for Phytophthora species.  

	...136. Zwankhuizen MJ, Govers F, Zadoks JC. 1998. Development of potato late blight epidemics: disease foci, disease gradi- ents, and infection sources. Phytopathol- ogy 88:754–63


Ristaino looked at same problem, cited Netherlands study and I guess decided it's all up in the air


this is the study from 1960 Zwankhuizen cited:

https://onlinelibrary.wiley.com/doi/pdf/10.1111/j.1744-7348.1960.tb03554.x
	THE EPIDEMIOLOGY OF PHYTOPHTHORA INFESTANS
	II. THE SOURCE OF INOCULUM
	J. M. HIRST
	O. J. STEDMAN

	Of 3260 blighted tubers planted as seed in 5 successive years (1954‐8), twenty‐one produced stems invaded from below ground by Phytophthora infestans (0.79 and 0.52% respectively of those infected artificially and naturally). Only in 1955 was no stem found to be invaded, in every other year they started epidemics in experimental plots. On average the first stem lesions were found 62 days after planting and 38 days before blight outbreak became general in the district.

	There was evidence of two patterns of dispersal for P. infestans. Distant spread was probably by air‐borne sporangia, but that near to the initial sources probably resulted from sporangia transported in water. The effects of initial sources of infection on the date when the disease became general could not be traced for more than a few hundred yards. Blight often reached crops remote from the experiments at the same time as it infected every plant within them; this often happened during the weather which elicited disease forecasts.

	Under certain conditions of soil moisture, P. infestans from artificially infected tubers planted as seed seemed able to pass through the soil to infect leaves near it and to start epidemics without invading stems from below ground. Attacks originating in this way developed similarly to those started by invaded stems, but their importance and the conditions limiting their occurrence have yet to be determined.


another paper:

https://onlinelibrary.wiley.com/doi/full/10.1111/j.1744-7348.1967.tb04433.x
	During falls of rain before 5% of the haulm was destroyed by blight, most rain water was deposited on soil at the bottom of the ridge, and least at the top in crops of King Edward, Majestic, and Up‐to‐Date potatoes. Afterwards less water was trapped half way up the side of the ridge than above or below. Water was also channelled down the stems and, while these were upright, was deposited in the channel often formed around the stem bases by wind movement. Fewer than 500 sporangia per ml. were seen in water collected when blight was present in the crop.

	Growing tubers of Ulster Ensign and King Edward, inoculated with P. infestans, infected healthy tubers less than 1–3 cm. away, when the soil water content was greater than 20%, and sporulation on the inoculated tubers was maximal. Similarly inoculated Up‐to‐Date and Majestic tubers sporulated less abundantly and failed to infect healthy tubers.

	Sporulation also occurred on inoculated seed tubers, although infection of the haulm from these tubers could not be confirmed. Water movement from the seed tuber region to the furrows may occur under suitable conditions.


https://link.springer.com/article/10.1007%2FBF02358962
	In this paper we present observations made during three years in a potato field in Sweden that indicated the presence of soil borne inoculum ofPhytophthora infestans. In 1994, a fungicide trial against late blight was left in the field with various degrees of late blight infection. In 1995, cereals was grown in the field. In 1996, certified potato seed tubers were planted and blight appeared early in the season in a pattern corresponding to the heavily infected areas in 1994. No volunteer potato plants were found in 1995 or 1996. Both mating types A1 and A2 were isolated in 1996 and 1997 and oospores were found in leaves, stems as well as in stolons.






what are sources on long-range spread of P infestans?

besides Zwankhuizen, other two cited by Skelsey are these:

https://link.springer.com/article/10.1007%2FBF02871689

https://www.ncbi.nlm.nih.gov/pubmed/18944575

saying spores much less viable after hour of exposure to sunlight, but remain more viable on cloudy day

Ristaino cites Zwankhuizen and Hirst paper,

this two for different organism: https://www.cabdirect.org/cabdirect/abstract/19871333744, https://ristainolab.cals.ncsu.edu/files/2016/01/Larkin-Geostatistical-analysis-of-Phytophthora-epidemic-development-in-commercial-bell-pepper-fields.pdf

this paper with a paragraph on it: https://apsjournals.apsnet.org/doi/pdfplus/10.1094/PDIS.1999.83.4.308



not cited: tracked spores spreading with UAVS: https://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168192310002881


a newer paper:

https://onlinelibrary.wiley.com/doi/full/10.1111/ppa.12235
	Potato late blight, which is caused by Phytophthora infestans, is one of the most destructive potato diseases worldwide (Leonard et al., 2001; Ristaino, 2002). The potential risk of disease development and consequent yield losses depends in part on the aerial transport of P. infestans sporangia to potato fields from off‐field sources (Aylor et al., 2011). Phytophthora infestans produces asexual sporangia that are adapted to aerial dispersal (Aylor, 2003; Skelsey et al., 2009a). The sporangia may disperse over distances of 40–60 km depending on the environmental conditions (Fry & Goodwin, 1997; Aylor et al., 2001). Viable sporangia deposited on the surfaces of susceptible host plants can germinate and invade host tissues or produce zoosporangia. Depending on host susceptibility and environmental conditions, the first symptoms can be visible 3–4 days after infection (Cooke et al., 2006). The appearance of symptoms is followed by the production of new sporangia, and the cycle of aerial sporangia dispersal and infection is repeated (Skelsey et al., 2008; Aylor et al., 2011). Researchers have documented the crucial role that the aerial dispersion of sporangia plays in the development of potato late blight (Skelsey et al., 2009b,c). Dispersal has been recognized as fundamental to the development of plant diseases because, without dispersal, many epidemics may fail to progress (Cooke et al., 2006). Also, knowledge of dispersal processes is needed to understand the movement of pathogens into a landscape (Cooke et al., 2006). In addition to dispersal, the temporal and spatial dynamics of disease epidemics must be understood in order for efficient disease‐management systems to be developed (Cooke et al., 2006). 

	...The temporal variations in daily ASC of P. infestans during the potato production season in Florenceville and Grand Falls in 2010, 2011 and 2012 are shown in Figure 2. In both areas, the highest mean ASC in all the samplers was detected between the end of July and the end of August. In Florenceville, the highest mean ASC was 32·87 sporangia m−3 in 2010 (9 August) and 28·71 sporangia m−3 in 2011 (25 August; Fig. 2), whereas in Grand Falls, the highest ASC was 61·37 sporangia m−3 in 2010 (27 August) and 24·65 sporangia m−3 in 2011 (29 July; Fig. 2). In 2012, the ASC in New Brunswick were very low; during that season, most of the daily airborne sporangia counts were zero, except on nine dates, which had very low daily sporangia concentrations (between 0·125 and 2·37 sporangia m−3). Considering that sporangia were trapped in low numbers and on only a few sampling dates in 2012, no analysis was done for these data, except for Kendall's correlation analysis. The concentrations of sporangia in Florenceville and Grand Falls were higher during the 2010 production season than in 2011 and 2012. Agronomists visiting potato fields reported blight outbreaks as follows. In 2010, 2011 and 2012, the first cases of late blight in New Brunswick were detected on 3, 20 and 4 July, respectively. In 2010 and 2011, the first cases of late blight were discovered 6–7 days after the first ASC peak. In 2012, only one case of late blight was reported; this period was followed by a major drought in July and August. However, the outbreaks did not necessarily occur in fields where samplers were located and confidentiality agreements with growers precluded disclosure of information on disease locations and assessment of its severity. 

	...One reason for the lack of accuracy of DSS is that they do not take into account the presence or absence of inoculum in the air, even though it has been documented that inoculum dispersal is a key factor in late blight epidemic development (Aylor et al., 2001; Skelsey et al., 2009c). Therefore, the main question is how ASC information (inoculum amount, spatiotemporal variation in inoculum) can be integrated into late blight management systems. A key message in the present paper is the fact that in addition to a DSS, a sustainable late blight management system requires quantification of the inoculum amount and a better understanding of the spatiotemporal variation in the inoculum (sporangia). To date, few research efforts have focused on the spatiotemporal variation of P. infestans sporangia above potato fields.


how does P infestens spread in epidemics?



https://apsjournals.apsnet.org/doi/pdfplus/10.1094/PHYTO.1998.88.8.754
	Van der Zaag (27) found one focus per km 2 originating from an infected seed tuber in potato fields. He also identified 0.2 infested refuse piles per km 2 . For only one potato field was the distribution of the disease in the field found to be associated with an infested refuse pile. He concluded that refuse piles were of minor impor- tance.


http://edepot.wur.nl/178358
	DATE ENGBERT VANDERZAAG

	...After 1845, a lot of effort was given to trace the cause of the potato disease. Opinions were rather divided on this subject until, in 1861, the classical work of A. DE BARY appeared: "The gossip of Kartoffelkrankheit, ihre Ursache und ihre Verhiitung." He clearly showed that Phytophthora infestans caused this disease. people knew the cause of the potato disease, the question of how Phytophthora was left over from year to year was also studied. DE BARY also studied this problem and came to the conclusion that the fungus as mycelium in sick tubers hibernate After many others have dealt with this subject Some have been able to confirm the opinion of DE BARY, while others have failed, When studying the literature it appears that three possibilities have been thought of specifically wintering: a) as saprophyt in the soil b) in the form of oospores c) as mycelium in diseased tubers Apart from these three possibilities there are a few others to mention and. For example, MASSEE (1910) was of the opinion that in almost every tuber and in the growing plants the fungus would be latent. ERIKSSON (1916 and 1921) went a little further and established the so-called mycoplasma theory. According to this theory, the fungus would be invisibly present in the protoplasm of the cells of the plant. Afterwards, never investigations were carried out that supported these assumptions. It was also believed that Phytophthora would occur on another host plant in the winter. DE BARY (1861 and 1876) has already thought of this possibility. His research on this has shown, however, that this way of hibernating can not be important. HASKELL (1921) mentions that Atropa belladonna can be affected by Phytophthora infestans. MOORE (1946) found a plant of Solanum dulcamara in the field, which had been attacked by Phytophthora in October. PETERSON (1947) announces that of the eleven wild perennial Solanace, which he inoculated, the fungus only sporulated on Solanum dulcamara. He never saw this plant sick in the field. Although Phytophthora can be found on tomatoes, OORT (1954) does not think it is probable that in the spring infection starts from early tomatoes, which are grown in department stores, since Phytophthora has never been discovered. The literature does not give the impression that the fungus can remain on another host plant.

	Phorophthora sporangien is known to be carried by the wind. In dry air, however, they soon lose their germination. According to OORT (1954), it is unlikely that the first infections will occur in the Netherlands as a result of blown-up sporangias. The three first-mentioned options will now be discussed briefly in succession. a. BREFELD (1883) was the first to assume that Phytophthora could preserve overwintering as saprophyt in the soil. MELHUS (1915) and ERIKSSON (1916) believed that KtiHN (1870) had already expressed this assumption, which was rightly contested by DE BRUYN (1922). The latter himself has also come to the conclusion that the fungus can live saprophytically and fights MELHUS (1915), JONES, GIDDINGS & LUTMAN (1912), who found that these were at most a distance of ± 1 cm from a diseased tuber. in the ground can be found. DE BRUYN (1926) has shown that in sterilized dredging soil the fungus can stay alive for a year. In sterilized clay soils it appears to be able to grow better than in sterilized sandy soil. The presence of organic matter is essential. Moreover, DE BRUYN has shown that the fungus can tolerate a temperature of -25 ° C. From her experiments she has come to the conclusion that Phytophthora infestans can live saprophytically in the soil and thus remain in the soil. SNIESZKO et al. (1947) also succeeded in keeping the fungus in sterilized soil alive for a considerable time (146 days). Other researchers, such as MURPHY (1922), have also investigated this method of over- wintering, but have assumed normal, non-sterilized soil. It turned out to them, however, that Phytophthora could only survive for a few weeks. In order to increase the risk of infection, STEWART (1913) planted potatoes in chests in January, which were filled with soil, diseased tubers and stalks in the autumn. In spite of favorable conditions healthy plants originated from the potted tubers. SCHILBERSZKY (1928) stamped ground in the autumn and diseased parts of potato plants in a box, which was placed under a roof outside. In the spring he could isolate Phytophthora from this. However, one wonders whether such circumstances occur in the field. If the fungus were to overwinter as a saprophyt, one should be able to demonstrate that potatoes, which are standing on a field where the disease occurred the previous year, become ill rather than potatoes grown on soil, on which potatoes have never been cultivated. However, no one succeeded. According to LOHNIS (1922), it is precisely the experience of Frisian farmers that the disease is often first encountered on torn grassland. Probably the strong foliage development plays a role here. b. DE BARY (1861) showed that sporangians in land only have a short life. MURPHY (1922) found that soil which had been inoculated with sporangien remained infectious for 34-44 days. It could, however, be possible that Phytophthora infestans can overwinter in the form of oospores. Since oospores are fairly common in Phytophthora species, intensive research has been carried out into the oospores of Phytophthora infestans. SMITH (1876) was the first, who thought they had found, but this was very decidedly contested by DE BARY (1876). He was of the opinion that SMITH has seen oospores of Pythium species as prospectors of Phytophthora infestans.

	SMORAWSKI (1890) claimed to have seen eye on sick tubers and MURPHY (1927) found some oops on sick tubers. He has given an accurate description of these oops. However, when they were separated from the diseased tuber, they died. Various researchers, such as CLINTON (1911), JONES et al. (1912), PETHYBRIDGE & MURPHY (1913), ROSENBAUM (1917), LOHNIS (1922) and DE BRUYN (1926), found oospores on nutrient media on which Phytophthora infestans were cultivated. It is clear that under certain circumstances the fungus can form oospores. In nature, she appears to have lost this property as well. Although oospores have thus been found a few times, it does not follow from the literature that they play a role in the overwintering of Phytophthora infestans. Even MURPHY (1927), who found them on sick tubers, takes this position. However, BRAUN (1953) recently asked again whether the rhino formation is not more general than has been assumed until now. c. DE BARY (1861) was one of the first to suggest that Phytophthora should overwinter in sick tubers. He managed to get a sick plant from a damaged tuber. After him there have been several researchers who have planted sick tubers to see if this phenomenon is common. In order not to tire the reader with the descriptions of all these attempts, a survey in the form of a table is sufficient. Every researcher was checked to see how many diseased tubers he had exhausted in total and the result. This table, which summarizes tests taken under different circumstances (including kase field trials), is only intended to give an impression of the result that has been achieved with the planting of diseased tubers.

	...The work of BRETTSCHNEIDER and PETERS is described by PRINGSHEIM (1876). MASSEE (1906) also observed that sick tubers gave sick plants. PETHYBRIDGE (1912) rightly disputes his experiments. SCHILBERSZKY (1928) and LIMASSET (1939) also reported sick plants, while SCHLUMBERGER (1927) only received healthy plants from diseased tubers. The communication by PETERSON (1947) that PETHYBRIDGE (1911) would have obtained from sick tubers of diseased plants is incorrect. This table shows that some researchers have succeeded in getting sick plants from sick tubers, while others have failed. The percentage of sick plants appears to vary considerably. By far the most diseased tubers produce or a healthy plant or do not emerge. It is therefore easy to understand that many researchers and especially those who have failed to get diseased plants from affected tubers have started to doubt this method of hibernating. Most researchers agree that it is difficult to explain how potato blight can occur so suddenly in the summer when the percentage of diseased plants is so low. Sick tubers are not only found in seed potatoes, but are also found on waste heaps, etc. BIFFEN (1926) points to the danger of affected tubers, which remain on the land when clearing potato pits. BONDE & SCHULTZ (1943) examined a total of 417 waste heaps in Maine during the period from 1935-1940, which included potato storage. 237 of these were found to be infected with Phytophthora early on. Of 52 waste heaps it could be shown that infection had started on the surrounding potato fields. That is why BONDE & SCHULTZ rightly point to the great danger of waste heaps. LARSON (1944) and HANNI (1949) also found highly infected waste heaps, while observations from BROOKS (1919) show that sick tubers thrown out on the field can be infected. Due to the work of MELHUS (1915), MURPHY & McKAY (1927), BONDE & SCHULTZ (1943) and PETERSON (1947), the opinion in America is quite widespread, that tubers infected by Phytophthora pose a danger to the potato crop. Little research has been done on this in the Netherlands. LOHNIS (1922) planted sick tubers, but did not get diseased plants, while DE BRUYN (1926) did a lot of work on the saprophytic lifestyle of Phytophthora infestans. The ideas of DE BRUYN have found general acceptance here. Since HANNI (1949) recently compiled a very detailed overview, it is sufficient to provide a concise literature overview. In this document only a few parts of the literature will be discussed in more detail.


	...SUMMARY

	INTRODUCTION After a short discussion on the consequences of the occurrence of potato blight in 1845 and later in the Netherlands, the aim of the investigation is described. This aim has been to detect the initial appearance of Phytophthora infestans in the field and the sources of infection (foci) and furthermore to investigate the spread of the disease from these sources (foci) and also the factors responsible for this spread. The results obtained in the course of the procedures gave rise to the study of new possibilities for the control of the disease. A plant is called „secondarily diseased" when the parasite has grown up-wards from the blighted tuber into one or more stems. Plants which have been infected otherwise are called ,.primarily diseased". A primary focus is started by a secondarily diseased plant. 

	...According to the literature, overwintering of Phytophthora would be possible, in particular: a. as a saprophyte in the soil, b. as oospores, c. as mycelium in diseased tubers. It has not been proved that overwintering according to a. and b. has a practical significance. Opinions differ as to the possibility of the survival as mycelium in diseased tubers. Several workers have found that in some cases the fungus can survive in this way, whereas others did not succeed in establishing this fact (table 1). The percentage of diseased plants resulting from attacked tubers is so low (according to the literature) that in general it was not considered possible to explain an epidemic occurrence in this way. 

	...A. Observations on refuse heaps. Four out of eighteen refuse heaps on which volunteers appeared here and there, were infected with potato blight by the end of May 1952 (first observation on May 13). The next year three plants of a refuse heap were diseased as early as April 28. Some plants of two more refuse heaps were attacked about mid-May. Diseased shootings from diseased rejected tubers were found in Friesland, in June of the same year. In all these cases, diseased plants were only found in places where diseased tubers also occurred. 

	... Observations on potato fields. Small foci of diseased plants oc-. curred in several fields occupied by Eersteling by the end of May 1952 (first observation May 20). One abnormal plant in every focus could be found which can be described as follows: plant growth somewhat suppressed; more damaged by the disease than the surrounding plants; apart from some fairly well-devel- oped stems, one or more small, weak shoots which are brown and shrivelled from the base upwards (fig. 2).

	From May 26 till June 18 of the following year, 27 foci were established in the variety Eersteling grown in „De Streek". In 17 of these foci a diseased plant was found of the type described above. From the remaining foci, one or more plants had always been removed so that it could not be proved how these foci were produced. 

	...On inquiry all the users of the fields where foci were found, said that some diseased tubers had indeed occurred in the seed potatoes. From this information as well as from the above description, it is apparent that there is a relationship between the first appearance of potato blight and the presence of diseased tubers in the seed potatoes used. 

	4. Field trials

	In order to make the above relationship clearer, tubers were planted which had been infected naturally and artificially (tables 2 and 3). The first diseased plants appeared by the end of May and the beginning of June; on them there was always a small diseased shoot which had turned brown starting from the tuber (figs. 4 and 5). The fungus sporulated on this small brown shoot. These plants exhibited the same symptoms as the plants that had been found in the field. At first the fungus sporulated only on the lower part of the diseased stem (above ground); later in favourable weather, also on the upper parts of the stem and on the leaves.

	These trials have proved that attacked tubers can produce diseased plants. 

	5. The way in which blighted tubers can produce diseased plants 

	According to the literature some investigators are of the opinion that spo- rangia which are produced on diseased tubers planted, can infect the young shoots of the plant. Other workers, however, assume that the mycelium of the fungus can grow upwards from the diseased tuber directly into the stem. From a trial it appeared that such a small number of sporangia are produced on non-cut diseased tubers, that the chance of infection in practice should be considered extremely unlikely. However, this mode of infection is not entirely excluded under experimental conditions in diseased tubers which were planted as halves in sterilized soil (table 4).

	Anatomical examination of ten diseased stems which were brown from the point of attachment with the tuber upwards, proved that the fungus was har- boured at several places in the underground stem, particularly in the cortex parenchyma.  

	From the trial described above and from the anatomical examination, it can be concluded that Phytophthora can grow upwards from the diseased tuber into a stem (see also fig. 6) and that this is the normal way in which the above- ground parts of a plant (whose tuber is diseased) can become infected. These plants have been indicated as secondarily diseased. 

	...In „De Streek" in 1953, the year when most thorough observations were made, 15 foci were found in potato fields, scattered over an area of about 16 km 2 , i.e. about one focus per km 2 (= 80 ha potatoes), on an average. Assum- ing that about 100 diseased tubers have to be planted to obtain a focus, this means one diseased tuber per 1600 kg seed potatoes. According to information from farmers it can be accepted that so many diseased tubers are planted. In the next chapter it will appear that in „De Streek" one focus can contaminate 1 km 2 in about one month under normal weather conditions. The general oc- 61 currence of the disease can therefore be explained in this way. The infection which can start from volunteers on refuse heaps is not included in this estimate. 

	There is no reason to suppose that Phytophthora survives in some other way than through diseased tubers and thus produces the first infection in spring. Some arguments are advanced to prove this assumption.

	...C. The significance of.the percentage of land occupied by potatoes. In a region were potatoes are widely grown, far less sporangia are lost and the fungus can spread much faster (fig. 13) than in a region were potatoes are only scarcely grown (fig. 15).

	When a source of infection is very small and a neighbouring field lies at a large distance, it is quite possible that no infection of the neighbourhood takes place. This is often the case with foci on refuse heaps when they are not ad- jacent to a potato field.  

	D. The distance which sporangia can cover.

	There are only few reliable data available with regard to the distance covered by the sporangia. Therefore the following experiment was conducted in 1954.

	On the island of Rottumeroog, situated in the Waddenzee at 11 km north of the Netherlands, tubers were planted which were entirely healthy (10 are = 0,25 acre). No volunteers were found in the field where they were planted. After a close inspection of the island on July 25 it was established that no diseased plants occurred. When blight had spread throughout the province of Groningen the first attacked leaves appeared in the island. This proves that sporangia of Phytophthora can be carried by the wind over a distance of at least 11 km without losing their viability.

	...Potato growers should attempt to control potato blight by taking the mea- sures indicated below: 

	a. The utmost care should be taken that no diseased tubers are planted. For this purpose it is necessary to carry out a very close inspection in the spring. 

	b. Diseased tubers should be collected and destroyed, so that they cannot produce shoots. 

	c. Inspection of the fields for the detection of primary foci should be started at the end of May. These foci should be completely destroyed, either by haulm killing or by pulling the plants out and covering them with earth. The vicinity of the destroyed plants should be carefully sprayed.  


found that diseased seed potatoes grow up from the tuber to the stem, these "foci" of infection are different from tubers surrounding it, disease can stay in tubers over winter, and this is the normal way how epidemics start. One infected tuber can infect 1 km^2 of potatoes around it in a month in favorable weather conditions. A great many spores are needed to infect neighboring fields and found that putting a few diseased plants in a refuse heap near a field did not infect it.


Ristaino wrote this:

https://ristainolab.cals.ncsu.edu/files/2015/10/Ristaino-JB-Gumpertz-ML-NEW-FRONTIERS-IN-THE-STUDY-OF-DISPERSAL.pdf
	...Aerial dispersal of inoculum from sporulating lesions on leaves, stems or fruit to other parts of plants within and between fields is a major mechanism of dispersal for Phytophthora species that infect primarily above ground portions of plants (mechanism IV). For P. infestans on potato, new foci will develop and overlap both within and across many rows and the rate of disease increase can be rapid (136).  Sporangia of P. infestans do not survive under conditions of long-distance dispersal since sporangia viability is decreased under dry conditions. Short-range aerial dispersal has been reported for sporangia of P. infestans.

	...Spatial patterns of late blight epidemics on local and regional scales were stud- ied using a combination of spatially referenced data and genetic markers to make inferences concerning dispersal of the pathogen from primary inoculum sources (2, 89, 136). In one study in the Netherlands,  inoculum sources were identified using a combination of disease gradient analyses, spatially referenced mapping, and  DNA  fingerprinting  of  isolates  (136).  Most  of  the  sources  of  inoculum  in conventional potato fields originated from nearby refuse piles that were upwind of  conventional  fields  (136).


source 136 says:

https://apsjournals.apsnet.org/doi/pdfplus/10.1094/PHYTO.1998.88.8.754
	Maarten J. Zwankhuizen, Francine Govers, and Jan C. Zadoks

	...Although other sources cannot be excluded in our study (e.g., infected seed tubers or undetected infested refuse piles), the occurrence of a general epidemic can be explained by the presence of the few initial foci found in infested refuse piles. 

	...In 1995 and 1996, due to unfavorable  weather  conditions,  hardly  any  field-to-field  disease spread was observed. In 1994 and 1995, the majority of infections in  organic  fields  probably  originated  from  refuse  piles,  surround- ing conventional fields, and organic seed tubers.

	...This study is the first to provide combined epidemiological and genotypic evidence that infested refuse piles were important sources for the establishment of early foci within fields, which may lead to a general epidemic of late blight in an agricultural area. In 1994, infested organic crops acted as late or secondary infection sources, resulting in dispersal of at least two genotypes of the late blight fungus over an area of 25 km 2 in a period of 2 weeks.


also in that paper:


	...Disease foci. Foci on refuse piles had a similar structure as the foci described by Van der Zaag (27) and appeared to have origi- nated from infected tubers. Foci encountered in potato fields did not include plants that could have originated from infected seed tubers, according to the description of Van der Zaag (27). In a few cases, diseased seed tubers were found, but they were only slightly infected. It is likely that these tubers were infected by spores washed down from infected leaves and stems. Experiments are needed to test this hypothesis.


in 2015 Ristaino cites the 1998 paper "first to provide combined epidemiological and genotypic evidence that infested refuse piles were important sources for the establishment of early foci within fields" and makes the results sound more definite than they actually were. Why?

The conception of how the disease spreads from that one source (Zwankhuizen), which was tentative, differed from the conception of how the disease spread concluded in a large literature review. 


Skelsey did something similar:

https://apsjournals.apsnet.org/doi/pdfplus/10.1094/PHYTO-06-09-0148
	Invasion of Phytophthora infestans at the Landscape Level: How Do Spatial Scale and Weathe r Modulate the Consequences of Spatial Hete rogeneity in Host Resistance?

	Peter Skelsey, Walter A. H. Rossing, Ge ert J. T. Kessel, and Wopke van der Werf

	...The aerial spread of pathogen inoculum to uninfected hosts is crucial to the epidemic phase of potato late blight (18,19,46).

	...Zwankhuizen et al. (54), using DNA fingerprinting, showed that P. infestansa spread from infested crops over an area of 25 km 2 in a period of 2 weeks. In one instance, sporangia of P. infestans from a refuse pile were found or inferred to infect potato fields up to 900 m away.


https://apsjournals.apsnet.org/doi/pdfplus/10.1094/PHYTO.1998.88.8.754
	Source-target relations. An infested refuse pile was found at a median distance of 600 m, with 50% of the distances between 160 and 900 m, for 14 out of 19 potato fields (74%) in which early foci were studied in 1994 and 1995. An infested refuse pile ap- peared the most likely infection source for seven out of nine foci in potato fields from which isolates were characterized (Table 3).


This is a shame, since it makes it harder to figure out how the Irish potato famine spread so rapidly in 1845, 1846, and 1848.

Ristaino also participated in the debate over the diseases origin.

the debate is weird

https://www.washingtonpost.com/archive/politics/2002/03/18/potato-blights-origins-could-enable-its-demise/32cb094d-90cb-4399-8928-e9fe72237fdc/
	It was partly for this reason that North Carolina State University epidemiologist Jean B. Ristaino decided to revisit the famine in an attempt to determine the origin of the late blight fungus: "You find out where it's from, and you're likely to find varieties of potatoes that are most resistant to it," Ristaino said. "Understanding the source has always been a key question."


like, if it's a choice between Mexico and Peru, if you want to find disease-resistant potato just look at both? Reason she gives doesn't make sense

P infestans evolutionary history said to be tricky:

http://journals.plos.org/plosone/article?id=10.1371/journal.pone.0037003
	To better understand the evolutionary history of a group of organisms, an accurate estimate of the species phylogeny must be known. Traditionally, gene trees have served as a proxy for the species tree, although it was acknowledged early on that these trees represented different evolutionary processes. Discordances among gene trees and between the gene trees and the species tree are also expected in closely related species that have rapidly diverged, due to processes such as the incomplete sorting of ancestral polymorphisms. Recently, methods have been developed for the explicit estimation of species trees, using information from multilocus gene trees while accommodating heterogeneity among them. Here we have used three distinct approaches to estimate the species tree for five Phytophthora pathogens, including P. infestans, the causal agent of late blight disease in potato and tomato. Our concatenation-based “supergene” approach was unable to resolve relationships even with data from both the nuclear and mitochondrial genomes, and from multiple isolates per species. Our multispecies coalescent approach using both Bayesian and maximum likelihood methods was able to estimate a moderately supported species tree showing a close relationship among P. infestans, P. andina, and P. ipomoeae. The topology of the species tree was also identical to the dominant phylogenetic history estimated in our third approach, Bayesian concordance analysis. Our results support previous suggestions that P. andina is a hybrid species, with P. infestans representing one parental lineage. The other parental lineage is not known, but represents an independent evolutionary lineage more closely related to P. ipomoeae. While all five species likely originated in the New World, further study is needed to determine when and under what conditions this hybridization event may have occurred.


a new species P andina found in 2010, said to by hybrid of P infestans and unkown species.

but this study pointed to Mexico instead of South America like Ristaino said:


	... A recent coalescent-based analysis of nuclear and mitochondrial loci suggested that the oldest mutations found in P. infestans populations originated in South America [70]. Others, however, have suggested that the presence of a genetically diverse, sexually reproducing population, as well as the sister species P. ipomoeae and P. mirabilis , in the highland regions of central Mexico indicates a likely origin there [20]. The occurrence of resistance genes in wild, endemic potato species has also been argued as evidence for an extensive period of host- pathogen co-evolution in central Mexico [20,71]. Our data may be more in line with a Mexican origin for Clade 1C due to the basal position of P. mirabilis . However, paleoecological changes over the past , 10 million years, such as the final uplift of the Andes, the closing of the Isthmus of Panama, and glaciations during the Pleistocene [72], may have significantly altered the distributions of both hosts and pathogens. While molecular clock methods have been used to estimate the time of origin for several Neotropical groups (e.g., [73,74,75]), few reliable calibrations exist within the Oomycota fossil record to calibrate coalescent-based speciation times with absolute geologic time [76]. In addition, our datasets typically contained only a single haplotype from P. ipomoeae and P. phaseoli , making our estimates of population size and speciation times less reliable [12]. Additional data will be needed to determine when P. infestans , and Clade 1C in general, originated; this in turn may provide additional insight into the conditions leading to the hybrid origin of P. andina .


Is Mexico South America debate making it harder to figure out P infestans?

there's a reason to look into it that Ristaino missed: to see if anyone artificially selected it to be more deadly any time in its history. Given how British gov treated the Irish, not an unreasonable thing to look for.


http://www.pnas.org/content/111/24/8791.short
	The potato late blight pathogen was introduced to Europe in the 1840s and caused the devastating loss of a staple crop, resulting in the Irish potato famine and subsequent diaspora. Research on this disease has engendered much debate, which in recent years has focused on whether the geographic origin of the pathogen is South America or central Mexico. Different lines of evidence support each hypothesis. We sequenced four nuclear genes in representative samples from Mexico and the South American Andes. An Andean origin of P. infestans does not receive support from detailed analyses of Andean and Mexican populations. This is one of a few examples of a pathogen with a known origin that is secondary to its current major host.

	...The potato pathogenPhytophthora infestans, the causal agent of potato late blight, is the plant pathogen that has most greatly impacted humanity to date. This pathogen is best known for its causal involvement in the Irish potato famine after in-troduction of the HERB-1 strain to Ireland from the Americas in the 19th century (1). To this day, potato late blight remainsa major threat to food security and carries a global cost conservatively estimated at more than $6 billion per year (2). In the 1980s, a single asexual lineage named US-1, possibly derivedfrom the same metapopulation as HERB-1 (1), dominated global populations, whereas a genetically diverse and sexual population ofP. infestans in central Mexico led to formulation of the hypothesis identifying Mexico as this pathogen’s center of origin(3,4). 


P infestans origin different from origin of current major host, sexually reproducing variant apparently hangs out in Mexico but every once in awhile asexual variant wreaks global havoc


	...We found multilocus support for a Mexican origin of P. infestans . Bayesian phylogeographic analysis rooted both P. infestans and Phytophthora clade 1c in Mexico for each of four nuclear loci. Our results are consistent with the population biology of P. infestans in central Mexico and, taken together, point to Mexico as the origin of this pathogen. These results are supported by the previously noted pathogen and host characteristics. Specifically, Toluca populations are sexual, whereas South American populations of P. infestans are clonal (6, 9, 10, 17 – 19). Both mating types of P. infestans are known to have been present since at least the 1960s in central Mexico (37, 38).


one in Andes has clonal reproduction while one in Mexico has sexual reproduction

	
	The genealogical connections between continents that we observed in our phylogeographic analysis are consistent with the movement of P.  infestans among widespread potato growing regions. Migration estimates using microsatellite variation also support our sequence analysis by showing migration from Mexico to the Andes, but not from the Andes to Mexico ( SI Appendix ). The commercial potato seed trade can explain much of the current global population structure of P. infestans ; however, the early movements of P. infestans have not been fully reconstructed (1), and examination of the processes underlying the emergence of new, highly successful strains is ongoing (3, 39). The diverse population in central Mexico may be the ultimate source for the appearance of new strains worldwide (3, 40), although seed potatoes from Europe are behind recent migrations of virulent strains (41, 42).


migration patters point to the diverse population in central Mexico being the source for emergence of new strains worldwide. Potato seed trade explains current global population structure, and seed potatoes from Europe are behind recent migrations.

	
	...Our intention was to determine the timing of divergence of the Andean lineages and their relationship to the Toluca population in Mexico. Surprisingly, we found evidence for diversification of the Andes population as a result of admixture or hybridization.


found evidence the clonal andes population was the result of hybridization with the TOluca population. 

Recently discovered P andina was also said to be a hybrid of P infestans and an unknown species. 


http://epicofevolution.com/dialog/hybridization-in-evolution.html
	For over a century, scientists have focused on natural selection as  the driving force of evolution.  Darwin noted that just as important as selection is variation.  So where does all this variation come from?

	With DNA sequencing technology, scientists are learning more and more about how variation comes about.  And one of the most important sources of variation is hybridization.

	Hybridization is the  interbreeding between animals or plants of different species that results in a novel offspring. Though infrequent, hybridization is a powerful driver of evolution.

	Famous hybrid animals include mules (horse/donkeys), zeedonks  (zebra/donkey), beefalo (bison/cow); liger (lion/tiger); killer bees (European bee and African bee.) Hybrid plants include wheat (three wild grasses  ) and grapefruit (pomelo/orange).  Hybridization is the  interbreeding between animals or plants of different species that results in a novel offspring. Hybridization, though infrequent, is a powerful driver of evolution.

	...While hybridization is an extremely rare event, it’s consequences are huge.   Because hybridization can create a tremendously successful variant, it can quickly sweep through an ecosystem and become a dominant variety.  Now, thanks to genome sequencing, we can see this selective sweep.  


Hybridization events are supposed to be when two similar species reproduce a new species (like horse + donkey = mule), so the DNA changes significantly in a short period of time. Hybridization events are said to be extremely rare.


http://www.pnas.org/content/111/24/8791.short
	...Nevertheless, even  moderate  support  for  hybridization  generating  novel lineages of P. infestans is compelling, given that a new pathogen of Solanum hosts, P. andina , has been generated via hybridiza- tion (16), and that infrequent hybridization among lineages of P. infestans is suspected to be responsible for novel genotypes elsewhere (43).


apparently the way P infestans has worked is that the original population stays in Toluca, Mexico, then every once in awhile variants with significant changes in DNA spread throughout the world


	... The root of the P. infestans mitochondrial genome was recently dated to 460 y ago (95% highest probability density, 300 – 643), around the time of the Spanish conquest of the Americas (1). Thus, the two major mitochondrial haplotypes may be the product of movement of the pathogen by humans, resulting in the formation of a new population of P. infestans and the evolution of diverged mtDNA haplotypes before global expansion of the pathogen some 200 y later.


I think this is saying P infestans first appeared when Spanish showed up and killed Aztecs?

The Aztecs had a famine in 1450, but on edge of range and couldn't find anything about potato failures

disease did play a big role in Spanish conquest of Aztecs, as well as active measures, with many of them dying from divide-and-conquer tactics and smallpox. A lot of Aztecs died of famine during the conquest, but didn't see anything saying potato failure involved.

what is significance of P infestans showing up then?


pg 40 has tree of strains lined up over time: https://arxiv.org/ftp/arxiv/papers/1305/1305.4206.pdf

I think saying it was split off from parent by movement of Spanish? like diverse in DNA associated with diverse location, and Spanish helped give it diverse location


this imply Spanish moved P infestans from Toluca to Peru?


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Spanish_conquest_of_the_Inca_Empire
	The long-term effects of the arrival of the Spanish on the population of South America were simply catastrophic. While this is the case for every group of Native-Americans that encountered Europeans from the fifteenth century onwards, the Incan population suffered a dramatic and quick decline following contact. It is estimated that parts of the empire, notably the Central Andes, suffered a population decline ratio of 58:1 during the years of 1520–1571.[21]

	The single greatest cause of the decimation of native populations was infectious disease. Old World Eurasian diseases, which had long been endemic on the Continent, were carried unknowingly by colonists and conquistadors. As these were new to the natives, they had no acquired immunity and suffered very high rates of death. More died of disease than any army or armed conflict.[22] As the Inca did not have as strong a writing tradition as the Aztec or Maya, it is difficult for historians to estimate population decline or any events after conquest. But, it is apparent that the Inca began to contract the diseases several years before the Spanish appeared in the region, as it was likely carried to their empire by traders and travelers. The outbreak, believed to be hemorrhagic smallpox, reached the Andes in 1524. While numbers are unavailable, Spanish records indicate that the population was so devastated by disease that they could hardly resist the foreign forces.

	Historians differ as to whether the illness of the 1520s was smallpox; a minority of scholars claim that the epidemic was due to an indigenous illness called Carrion's disease. In any case, a 1981 study by N. D. Cook the shows that the Andes suffered from three separate population declines during colonization. The first was of 30–50 percent during the first outbreak of smallpox. When a measles outbreak occurred, there was another decline of 25–30 percent. Finally, when smallpox and measles epidemics occurred together, which occurred from 1585 to 1591, a decline of 30–60 percent occurred. Collectively these declines amounted to a decline of 93 percent from the pre-contact population in the Andes region.[23] Mortality was particularly high among children, ensuring that the impact of the epidemics would extend to the next generation.[3]


central andes had 58:1 population decline after Spanish arrived, war and a lot of disease

wikipedia doesn't say anything about famine, but these high-school textbooks do:

https://books.google.com/books?id=yxEeBgAAQBAJ&pg=PA39&lpg=PA39

https://books.google.com/books?id=yzBAQR4OhcIC&pg=PA9&lpg=PA9


http://spudsmart.com/domestication-of-the-potato/
	The potato was the major staple food of the Inca Empire, which had a population of 12 million people and stretched for 4,000 kilometres in South America. The crop gradually diffused from Peru to the rest of the Andes and beyond. Pictures of potato plants and tubers on ancient pottery demonstrate that the potato was cultivated for thousands of years before the Spanish conquistadors reached South America.

	The origin of the European potato has recently been traced from the Andean highlands to Chile where it (inadvertently) became more adapted to growing under day lengths similar to those in Europe. From Chile, the potato travelled to the Canary Islands in the Atlantic Ocean and eventually to the European mainland where it grew to become an important food crop.


http://www.discover-peru.org/inca-food/
	Food consumed by the inhabitants of the Inca Empire varied depending on where in the vast territory they lived.  People living near the coast based their diet on fresh seafood and fruits and in the Andes on potatoes and corn.  The vast majority of the Inca population lived along the Andes where in many places food could not be grown due to the rugged terrain and freezing temperatures.


http://www.history-magazine.com/potato.html
	Early Spanish chroniclers — who misused the Indian word batata (sweet potato) as the name for the potato — noted the importance of the tuber to the Incan Empire. The Incas had learned to preserve the potato for storage by dehydrating and mashing potatoes into a substance called chuñu. Chuñu could be stored in a room for up to 10 years, providing excellent insurance against possible crop failures. As well as using the food as a staple crop, the Incas thought potatoes made childbirth easier and used it to treat injuries.


https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/History_of_the_Incas
	The knowledge of these myths is due to oral tradition, since the Incas did not have writing. Manco Cápac, who became the leader of his tribe, probably did exist, despite lack of solid evidence.


https://io9.gizmodo.com/5872764/the-greatest-mystery-of-the-inca-empire-was-its-strange-economy
	Many aspects of Incan life remain mysterious, in part because our accounts of Incan life come from the Spanish invaders who effectively wiped them out. 


http://nora.nerc.ac.uk/id/eprint/7766/1/cp-5-375-2009.pdf
	Even though there is limited evidence for maize (a C4 plant) being grown in the basin, thiscrop requires good drainage and so was likely to have beengrown away from the immediate lake catchment (as is thecase today); only crops such as potatoes were/are cultivatedin the areas liable to inundation.

	...A different world was imposed with the arrival of the Spanish. Against a backdrop of disease and falling population numbers, communities were often forced to migrate and/or compelled to work under the encomienda system (ChepstowLusty et al., 2007). Much of the previously cultivated landscape became rapidly overgrown and irrigation canals and terraces were no longer maintained, falling into neglect and disuse.


seems plausible that the Spanish brought P infestans with them


sounds like causes of Inca collapse not entirely known:

http://users.pop.umn.edu/~rmccaa/aha2004/whypox.htm
	Why Blame Smallpox? 
	The Death of the Inca Huayna Capac and the Demographic Destruction of Tawantinsuyu (Ancient Peru)

	Robert McCaa, Aleta Nimlos, and Teodoro Hampe Martínez

	...Smallpox is widely blamed for the death of the Inca Huayna Capac and blamed as well for the enormous demographic catastrophe which enveloped Ancient Peru (Tawantinsuyu).  The historical canon now teaches that smallpox ravaged this virgin soil population before 1530, that is, before Francisco Pizarro and his band of adventurers established a base on the South American continent.[2]  Nevertheless the documentary evidence for the existence of a smallpox epidemic in this region before 1558 is both thin and contradictory.  In contrast to Mexico, where there is a broad range of sources documenting the first outbreak and the death of the Aztec ruler Cuitlahuatzin from smallpox in 1520, for Peru, the evidence rests almost entirely on rather brief references in chronicles, few of which state unequivocally that Huayna Capac died of the disease. 

	We advocate a more skeptical approach to assessing the causes of both the Inca’s death and the demographic destruction of Tawantinsuyu.  While the continued scrutiny of early colonial chronicles may yet provide conclusive evidence, we urge historians to take greater account of a wider-range of unconventional sources, such as linguistic evidence from early Quechua dictionaries, lessons learned from the World Health Organization’s global campaign to eradicate smallpox, physical descriptions of native peoples, and the examination of mummies for signs of smallpox, or the lack thereof.

	...From our re-examination of early chronicles (see table 1), linguistic evidence in three early dictionaries (table 3), physical descriptions of pock marked native peoples (or the lack thereof before 1558), we conclude that, as in the Caribbean also in the Andean region, the preponderance of the evidence points to a late introduction of smallpox—a quarter center after initial contact (in 1518 and 1558, respectively), after an enormous demographic devastation had already occurred.


the Spanish also brought famine and genocide from their policies after conquering the Inca:

http://paititieldorado.fr/en/paititi-eldorado/lhistoire-inca
	The Genocide

	Viceroy Toledo instituted a reform of the indigenous habitat which made it possible to regroup the useful “mass of work”, subjected to compulsory labor, without remuneration, so to speak clearly reduced in slavery. The entire Inca agricultural system, very productive, is annihilated to favor productions destined for export. The organization of farms in gigantic plantations drastically reduces yield, leading to terrible famines in the population.

	Indigenous slaves are especially affected in the terrible mines, where it is estimated that out of 12 million inhabitants, 5 million men, women and children perish in 25 years, victims of the insatiable thirst for gold and the inhumanity shown by the Spaniards towards them. In some provinces rich in gold or silver, two-thirds of the population is enslaved in the mines and perishes there. So much so that the Spaniards will finally have to bring “cargoes” of black slaves to replace them …

------


https://pub.epsilon.slu.se/2210/1/widmark_ak_100111.pdf
	When late blight first appeared in Europe it was not clear what caused this new disease, “the potato murrain” as it was called. At that time the idea that plant diseases were due to fungi was rather unorthodox and even heretical. The first to identify a fungus as the cause of the disease and give a detailed description of the pathogen was the Belgian mycologist, Marie-Anne Libert in 1845, who named it Botrytis vastatrix . A bit later the same year, Jean Francis Camille Montagne described the potato pathogen and gave it the name Botrytis infestans . The following year the reverend Miles J Berkeley published a paper, in which he attributed a fungus as the cause of the new disease. However, even if fungal mycelium was observed on the plant the general view was that it was a consequence of the disease and not the cause (Large, 1946; Bourke, 1991; Zadoks, 2008). The controversy continued until 1876, when Anton de Bary showed that the disease only developed on potato plants dusted with fungal spores and not on the untreated ones. He also demonstrated that tubers could be infected by watering sporangia into the soil . He was the first to observe the motile zoospores and described the life-cycle of the late blight pathogen. Anton de Bary renamed the pathogen to Phytophthora infestans , which means ‘infectious plant destroyer’ (Large, 1946; Turner, 2005). The same year, Robert Koch demonstrated that anthrax was caused by a bacterium that he called Bacillus anthracis (Kronvall, 2000). These discoveries helped pay the way for a general acceptance of the fact that diseases can be caused by microorganisms. 

	In Sweden, the 1845 epidemic of this new potato disease spread to Uppsala. As in other European countries, there was a debate about the cause of the disease. The famous mycologist Elias Fries participated in the debate from the beginning, and interestingly, was against the fungal theory. He suggested that the main causes were a combination of an excess of water during the growing season and the rich supply of nitrogen amended in the soil with new agricultural practises. He also believed that the potato plant became exhausted and degenerated without a re-generation through seeds (Eriksson, 1884). 



http://users.aber.ac.uk/gwg/pdf/andrivon.pdf